;; -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
(("IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering" "The IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering is an archival journal published monthly. The information published in this Transactions is designed to inform researchers, developers, managers, strategic planners, users, and others interested in state-of-the-art and state-of-the-practice activities in the knowledge and data engineering area. We are interested in well-defined theoretical results and empirical studies that have potential impact on the acquisition, management, storage, and graceful degeneration of knowledge and data, as well as in provision of knowledge and data services. Specific topics include, but are not limited to: a) artificial intelligence techniques, including speech, voice, graphics, images, and documents; b) knowledge and data engineering tools and techniques; c) parallel and distributed processing; d) real-time distributed; e) system architectures, integration, and modeling; f) database design, modeling and management; g) query design and implementation languages; h) distributed database control; j) algorithms for data and knowledge management; k) performance evaluation of algorithms and systems; l) data communications aspects; m) system applications and experience; n) knowledge-based and expert systems; and, o) integrity, security, and fault tolerance." "http://www.computer.org/tkde" (20681 64082 756672) feed 0 nil nil ((title nil "IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering") (link nil "http://www.computer.org/tkde") (description nil "The IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering is an archival journal published monthly. The information published in this Transactions is designed to inform researchers, developers, managers, strategic planners, users, and others interested in state-of-the-art and state-of-the-practice activities in the knowledge and data engineering area. We are interested in well-defined theoretical results and empirical studies that have potential impact on the acquisition, management, storage, and graceful degeneration of knowledge and data, as well as in provision of knowledge and data services. Specific topics include, but are not limited to: a) artificial intelligence techniques, including speech, voice, graphics, images, and documents; b) knowledge and data engineering tools and techniques; c) parallel and distributed processing; d) real-time distributed; e) system architectures, integration, and modeling; f) database design, modeling and management; g) query design and implementation languages; h) distributed database control; j) algorithms for data and knowledge management; k) performance evaluation of algorithms and systems; l) data communications aspects; m) system applications and experience; n) knowledge-based and expert systems; and, o) integrity, security, and fault tolerance.	") (language nil "en-us") (pubDate nil "Thu, 13 Dec 2012 11:00:06 GMT") (image nil (url nil "http://csdl.computer.org/common/images/logos/tkde.gif") (title nil "IEEE Computer Society") (description nil "List of recently published journal articles") (link nil "http://www.computer.org/tkde")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Multidimensional Sequence Classification based on Fuzzy Distances and Discriminant Analysis") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.223") (description nil "In this paper, we present a novel method aiming at multidimensional sequence classification. We propose a novel sequence representation, based on its fuzzy distances from optimal representative signal instances, called statemes. We also propose a novel modified Clustering Discriminant Analysis algorithm minimizing the adopted criterion with respect to both the data projection matrix and the class representation, leading to the optimal discriminant sequence class representation in a low-dimensional space, respectively. Based on this representation, simple classification algorithms, such as the nearest subclass centroid, provide high classification accuracy. A three step iterative optimization procedure for choosing statemes, optimal discriminant sub-space and optimal sequence class representation in the final decision space is proposed. The classification procedure is fast and accurate. The proposed method has been tested on a wide variety of multidimensional sequence classification problems, including handwritten character recognition, time series classification and human activity recognition, providing very satisfactory classification results.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.223")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Cocktail Approach for Travel Package Recommendation") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.233") (description nil "This paper provides a study of exploiting online travel information for personalized travel package recommendation. A critical challenge along this line is to address the unique characteristics of travel data, which distinguish travel packages from traditional items for recommendation. To that end, we first analyze the characteristics of the travel packages and develop a Tourist-Area-Season Topic (TAST) model. This TAST model can represent travel packages and tourists by topic distributions, where the topic extraction is conditioned on both the tourists and the intrinsic features of the landscapes. Then, based on this representation, we propose a cocktail approach to generate the lists for personalized travel package recommendation. Furthermore, we extend the TAST model to the Tourist-Relation-Area-Season Topic (TRAST) model for capturing the latent relationships among the tourists in each travel group. Finally, we evaluate the TAST model, the TRAST model, and the cocktail recommendation approach on the real-world travel package data. Experimental results show that the TAST model can effectively capture the unique characteristics of the travel data and the cocktail approach is thus much more effective than traditional recommendation techniques for travel package recommendation. Also, the TRAST model can be used as an effective assessment for travel group formation.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.233")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Learning Conditional Preference Networks From Inconsistent Examples") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.231") (description nil "The problem of learning Conditional Preference Networks(CP-nets) from a set of examples has received great attention recently. However, because of the randomicity of the users' behaviors and the observation errors, there is always some noise making the examples inconsistent, namely, there exists at least one outcome preferred over itself (by transferring) in examples. Existing CP-nets learning methods can not handle inconsistent examples. In this work, we introduce the model of learning consistent CP-nets from inconsistent examples and present a method to solve this model. We do not learn the CP-nets directly. Instead, we first learn a preference graph from the inconsistent examples, because dominance testing and consistency testing in preference graphs are easier than those in CP-nets. The problem of learning preference graphs is translated into a 0-1 programming and is solved by the branch-and-bound search. Then the obtained preference graph is transformed into a CP-net equivalently , which can entail a subset of examples with maximal sum of weight. Examples are given to show that our method can obtain consistent CP-nets over both binary and multivalued variables from inconsistent examples. The proposed method is verified on both simulated data and real data, and it is also compared with existing methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.231")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Effective Online Group Discovery in Trajectory Databases") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.193") (description nil "GPS-enabled devices are pervasive nowadays. Finding movement patterns in trajectory data stream is gaining in importance. We propose a group discovery framework that aims to efficiently support the online discovery of moving objects that travel together. The framework adopts a sampling-independent approach that makes no assumptions about when positions are sampled, gives no special importance to sampling points, and naturally supports the use of approximate trajectories. The framework's algorithms exploit state-of-the-art, density-based clustering (DBScan) to identify groups. The groups are scored based on their cardinality and duration, and the top-$k$ groups are returned. To avoid returning similar subgroups in a result, notions of domination and similarity are introduced that enable the pruning of low-interest groups. Empirical studies on real and synthetic data sets offer insight into the effectiveness and efficiency of the proposed framework.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.193")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Facilitating Document Annotation using Content and Querying Value") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.224") (description nil "A large number of organizations today generate and share textual descriptions of their products, services, and actions. Such collections of textual data contain significant amount of structured information, which remains buried in the unstructured text. While information extraction algorithms facilitate the extraction of structured relations, they are often expensive and inaccurate. We present a novel alternative approach that facilitates the generation of the structured metadata by identifying documents that are likely to contain information of interest and this information is going to be subsequently useful for querying the database. Our approach relies on the idea that humans are more likely to add the necessary metadata during creation time, if prompted by the interface; or that it is much easier for humans to identify the metadata when such information actually exists in the document, instead of naively prompting users to fill in forms with information that is not available in the document. We present algorithms that identify structured attributes that are likely to appear within the document, by jointly utilizing the content of the text and the query workload. Our experimental evaluation shows that our approach generates superior results compared to approaches that rely only on content or only on the query workload.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.224")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Practical Ensemble Classification Error Bounds for Different Operating Points") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.219") (description nil "Classification algorithms used to support the decisions of human analysts are often used in settings in which zero-one loss is not the appropriate indication of performance. The zero-one loss corresponds to the operating point with equal costs for false alarms and missed detections, and no option for the classifier to leave uncertain test samples unlabeled. A generalization bound for ensemble classification at the standard operating point has been developed based on two interpretable properties of the ensemble: strength and correlation, using the Chebyshev inequality. Such generalization bounds for other operating points have not been developed previously, and are developed in this paper. Significantly, the bounds are empirically shown to have much practical utility in determining optimal parameters for classification with a reject option, classification for ultra-low probability of false alarm, and classification for ultra-low probability of missed detection. Counter to the usual guideline of large strength and small correlation in the ensemble, different guidelines are recommended by the derived bounds in the ultra-low false alarm and missed detection probability regimes.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.219")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Efficient Index-Based Approaches for Skyline Queries in Location-Based Applications") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.216") (description nil "Enriching many location-based applications, various new skyline queries are proposed and formulated based on the notion of locational dominance, which extends conventional one by taking objects&amp;#8217; nearness to query positions into account additional to objects&amp;#8217; non-spatial attributes. To answer a representative class of skyline queries for location-based applications efficiently, this paper presents two index-based approaches, namely, Augmented R-tree and Dominance Diagram. Augmented R-tree extends R-tree by including aggregated non-spatial attributes in index nodes to enable dominance checks during index traversal. Dominance Diagram is a solution-based approach, by which each object is associated with a precomputed non-dominance scope wherein query points should have the corresponding object not locationally dominated by any other. Dominance Diagram enables skyline queries to be evaluated via parallel and independent comparisons between non-dominance scopes and query points, providing very high search efficiency. The performance of these two approaches is evaluated via empirical studies, in comparison with other possible approaches.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.216")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Supervised Multiple Kernel Embedding for Learning Predictive Subspaces") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.213") (description nil "For supervised learning problems, dimensionality reduction is generally applied as a preprocessing step. However, coupled training of dimensionality reduction and supervised learning steps may improve the prediction performance. In this paper, we propose a novel dimensionality reduction algorithm coupled with a supervised kernel-based learner, called supervised multiple kernel embedding, that integrates multiple kernel learning to dimensionality reduction and performs prediction on the projected subspace with a joint optimization framework. Combining multiple kernels allows us to combine different feature representations and/or similarity measures towards a unified subspace. We perform experiments on one digit recognition and two bioinformatics data sets. Our proposed method significantly outperforms multiple kernel Fisher discriminant analysis followed by a standard kernel-based learner, especially on low dimensions.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.213")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Clustering Based on Enhanced &#x03B1;-Expansion Move") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.202") (description nil "The exemplar-based data clustering problem can be formulated as minimizing an energy function defined on a Markov random field (MRF). However, most algorithms for optimizing MRF energy function can&amp;#8217;t be directly applied to the task of clustering, as the problem has a high-order energy function. In this paper, we first show that the high order energy function for the clustering problem can be simplified as a pairwise energy function with the metric property, and consequently it can be optimized by the alpha-expansion move algorithm based on graph cut. Then, the original expansion move algorithm is improved in the following two aspects: (I) Instead of solving a minimal s-t graph cut problem, we show that there is an explicit and interpretable solution for minimizing the energy function in the clustering problem. Based on this interpretation, a fast alpha-expansion move algorithm is proposed, which is much more efficient than the graph cut based algorithm. (II) The fast alpha-expansion move algorithm is further improved by extending its move space so that a larger energy value reduction can be achieved in each iteration. Experiments on benchmark datasets show the enhanced expansion move algorithm has a better performance, compared to other state-of-the-art exemplar-based clustering algorithms.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.202")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: EnBay: A Novel Pattern-Based Bayesian Classifier") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.197") (description nil "A promising approach to Bayesian classification is based on exploiting frequent patterns, i.e., patterns that frequently occur in the training dataset, to estimate the Bayesian probability. Pattern-based Bayesian classification focuses on building and evaluating reliable probability approximations by exploiting a subset of frequent patterns tailored to a given test case. This paper proposes a novel and effective approach to estimate the Bayesian probability. Differently from previous approaches, the Entropy-based Bayesian classifier, namely EnBay, focuses on selecting the minimal set of long and not overlapped patterns that best complies with a conditional-independence model, based on an entropy-based evaluator. Furthermore, the probability approximation is separately tailored to each class. An extensive experimental evaluation, performed on both real and synthetic datasets, shows that EnBay is significantly more accurate than most state-of-the-art classifiers, Bayesian and not.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.197")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: iLike: Bridging the Semantic Gap in Vertical Image Search by Integrating Text and Visual Features") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.192") (description nil "With the development of Internet and Web 2.0, large volume of multimedia content have been made online. It is highly desired to provide easy accessibility to such contents. Towards this goal, content-based image retrieval has been intensively studied in the research community, while text-based search is better adopted in the industry. Both approaches have inherent disadvantages and limitations. Therefore, unlike the great success of text search, Web image search engines are still premature. In this paper, we present iLike, a vertical image search engine which integrates textual and visual features to improve retrieval performance. We bridge the semantic gap by capturing the meaning of each text term in the visual feature space, and re-weight visual features according to their significance to the query terms. We also bridge the user intention gap since we are able to infer the \"visual meanings\" behind the textual queries. Last but not least, we provide a visual thesaurus, which is generated from the statistical similarity between the visual space representation of textual terms. Experimental results show that our approach improves both precision and recall, compared with content-based or text-based image retrieval techniques. More importantly, search results from iLike is more consistent with users' perception of the query terms.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.192")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Efficient Cluster Labeling for Support Vector Clustering") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.190") (description nil "We propose a new efficient algorithm for solving the cluster labeling problem in Support Vector Clustering (SVC). The proposed algorithm analyzes the topology of the function describing the SVC cluster contours and explores interconnection paths between critical points separating distinct cluster contours. This process allows distinguishing disjoint clusters and associating each point to its respective one. The proposed algorithm implements a new fast method for detecting and classifying critical points while analyzing the interconnection patterns between them. Experiments indicate that the proposed algorithm significantly improve the accuracy of the SVC labeling process in the presence of clusters of complex shape, while reducing the processing time required by existing SVC labeling algorithms by orders of magnitude.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.190")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Family of Joint Sparse PCA Algorithms for Anomaly Localization in Network Data Streams") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.176") (description nil "Determining anomalies in data streams that are collected and transformed from various types of networks has recently attracted significant research interest. Principal Component Analysis (PCA) has been extensively applied to detecting anomalies in network data streams. However, none of existing PCA based approaches addresses the problem of identifying the sources that contribute most to the observed anomaly, or anomaly localization. In this paper, we propose novel sparse PCA methods to perform anomaly detection and localization for network data streams. Our key observation is that we can localize anomalies by identifying a sparse low dimensional space that captures the abnormal events in data streams. To better capture the sources of anomalies, we incorporate the structure information of the network stream data in our anomaly localization framework. Furthermore, we extend our joint sparse PCA framework with multi-dimensional Karhunen Lo`eve Expansion (KLE) that considers both spatial and temporal domains of data streams to stabilize localization performance.We have performed comprehensive experimental studies of the proposed methods, and have compared our methods with the state-of-the-art using three real-world data sets from different application domains. Our experimental studies demonstrate the utility of the proposed methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.176")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Dealing with Uncertainty: A Survey of Theories and Practices") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.179") (description nil "Uncertainty accompanies our life processes, and covers almost all fields of scientific studies. Two general categories of uncertainty, namely, aleatory uncertainty and epistemic uncertainty, exist in the world. While aleatory uncertainty refers to the inherent randomness in nature, derived from natural variability of the physical world (e.g., random show of a flipped coin), epistemic uncertainty origins from human's lack of knowledge of the physical world, as well as ability of measuring and modeling the physical world (e.g., computation of the distance between two cities). Different kinds of uncertainty call for different handling methods. Aggarwal, Yu, Sarma, Zhang et al. have made good surveys on uncertain database management based on the probability theory. This paper reviews multi-disciplinary uncertainty processing activities in diverse fields. Beyond the dominant probability theory and fuzzy theory, we also review information-gap theory and recently derived uncertainty theory. Practices of these uncertainty handling theories in the domains of economics, engineering, ecology, and information sciences are also described. It is our hope that this study could provide insights to the database community on how uncertainty is managed in other disciplines; and further challenge and inspire database researchers to develop more advanced data management techniques and tools to cope with a variety of uncertainty issues in the real world.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.179")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Group Incremental Approach to Feature Selection Applying Rough Set Technique") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.146") (description nil "Many real data increase dynamically in size. This phenomena occurs in several fields including economics, population studies and medical research. As an effective and efficient mechanism to deal with such data, incremental technique has been proposed in the literature and attracted much attention, which stimulates the result in this paper. When a group of objects are added to a decision table, we first introduce incremental mechanisms for three representative information entropies and then develop a group incremental rough feature selection algorithm based on information entropy. When multiple objects are added to a decision table, the algorithm aims to find the new feature subset in a much shorter time. Experiments have been carried out on nine UCI data sets and the experimental results show that the algorithm is effective and efficient.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.146")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Towards the Automatic Extraction of Policy Networks using Web Links and Documents") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.159") (description nil "Policy networks are widely used by political scientists and economists to explain various financial and social phenomena, such as the development of partnerships between political entities or institutions from different levels of governance. The analysis of policy networks demands a series of arduous and time consuming manual steps including interviews and questionnaires. In this paper, we estimate the strength of relations between actors in policy networks using features extracted from data harvested from the web. Features include webpage counts, outlinks, and lexical information extracted from web documents or web snippets. The proposed approach is automatic and does not require any external knowledge source, other than the specification of the word forms that correspond to the political actors. The features are evaluated both in isolation and jointly for both positive and negative (antagonistic) actor relations. The proposed algorithms are evaluated on two EU policy networks from the political science literature. Performance is measured in terms of correlation and mean square error between the human rated and the automatically extracted relations. Correlation of up to 0.74 is achieved for positive relations. The extracted networks are validated by political scientists and useful conclusions about the evolution of the networks over time are drawn.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.159")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Omnivariate Rule Induction Using a Novel Pairwise Statistical Test") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.155") (description nil "Rule learning algorithms, for example, Ripper, induces univariate rules, that is, a propositional condition in a rule uses only one feature. In this paper, we propose an omnivariate induction of rules where at each condition, both a univariate and a multivariate condition is trained and the best is chosen according to a novel statistical test. This paper has three main contributions: First, we propose a novel statistical test, the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test, to compare two classifiers, which is a variant of the 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test and give the connections to other tests as $5\\times 2$ cv $F$ test and $k$-fold paired $t$ test. Second, we propose a multivariate version of Ripper where Support Vector Machine (SVM) with linear kernel is used to find multivariate linear conditions. Third, we propose an omnivariate version of Ripper where the model selection is done via the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test. Our results indicate that (1) the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test has higher power (lower type II error), lower type I error, and higher replicability compared to the 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test, (2) omnivariate rules are better in that they choose whichever condition is more accurate, selecting the right model automatically and separately for each condition in a rule.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.155")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Optimizing Multi-Top-k Queries over Uncertain Data Streams") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.126") (description nil "Query processing over uncertain data streams, in particular top-$k$ query processing, has become increasingly important due to its wide application in many fields such as sensor network monitoring and internet traffic control. In many real applications, multiple top-$k$ queries are registered in the system. Sharing the results of these queries is a key factor in saving the computation cost and providing real time response. However, due to the complex semantics of uncertain top-$k$ query processing, it is nontrivial to implement sharing among different top-$k$ queries and few works have addressed the sharing issue. In this paper, we formulate various types of sharing among multiple top-$k$ queries over uncertain data streams based on the frequency upper bound of each top-$k$ query. We present an optimal dynamic programming solution as well as a more efficient (in terms of time and space complexity) greedy algorithm to compute the execution plan of executing queries for saving the computation cost between them. Experiments have demonstrated that the greedy algorithm can find the optimal solution in most cases, and it can almost achieve the same performance (in terms of latency and throughput) as the dynamic programming approach.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.126")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: NHOP: A Nested Associative Pattern for Analysis of Consensus Sequence Ensembles") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.151") (description nil "In this research, we introduce a novel, complex associative pattern that is found to be very useful because it identifies the core associative structure from the data. We refer to it as nested high-order pattern (or NHOP). The pattern is more specific than associative patterns represented as multiple variables. It also generalizes sequential patterns, as the outcomes need not be contiguous. This paper outlines two search algorithms, the r-Tree and Best-k algorithm in its detection. It was then applied to an analysis of biomolecule using the aligned sequence family of the molecule. In the SH3 protein, a model for protein-protein interaction mediator, we identify functional groups (core and binding sites) in the three-dimensional structure as well as amino acid patterns dominating certain species.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.151")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Static and Dynamic Structural Correlations in Graphs") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.133") (description nil "Real-life graphs not only contain nodes and edges, but also have events taking place, e.g., product sales in social networks. Some events exhibit strong correlations with the network structure, while others do not. Such structural correlations will shed light on viral influence existing in the corresponding network. Unfortunately, the traditional association mining concept is not applicable in graphs since it only works on homogeneous datasets. We propose a novel measure for assessing structural correlations in graphs with events. The measure applies hitting time to aggregate the proximity among nodes that have the same event. In order to calculate correlation scores for many events in large networks, we develop a scalable framework, called gScore, using sampling and approximation. By comparing to the situation where events are randomly distributed in the network, our method is able to discover events that are highly correlated with the graph structure. We test gScore's effectiveness by synthetic events on the DBLP co-author network and report interesting correlation results in a social network extracted from TaoBao.com, the largest online shopping network in China. Scalability of gScore is tested on the Twitter network. We also propose a dynamic measure which can be used for discovering detailed evolutionary patterns.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.133")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Latent Structured Perceptrons for Large-Scale Learning with Hidden Information") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.129") (description nil "Many real-world data mining problems contain hidden information (e.g., unobservable latent dependencies). We propose a perceptron-style method, latent structured perceptron, for fast discriminative learning of structured classification with hidden information. We also give theoretical analysis and demonstrate good convergence properties of the proposed method. Our method extends the perceptron algorithm for the learning task with hidden information, which can be hardly captured by traditional models. It relies on Viterbi decoding over latent variables, combined with simple additive updates. We perform experiments on one synthetic dataset and two real-world structured classification tasks. Compared to conventional non-latent models (e.g., conditional random fields, structured perceptrons), our method is significantly more accurate on real-world tasks. Compared to existing heavy probabilistic models of latent variables (e.g., latent conditional random fields), our method lowers the training cost significantly (almost one order magnitude faster) yet with comparable or even superior classification accuracy. In addition, experiments demonstrate that the proposed method has good scalability on large-scale problems.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.129")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: The Adaptive Clustering Method for the Long Tail Problem of Recommender Systems") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.119") (description nil "This is a study of the long tail problem of recommender systems when many items in the long tail have only a few ratings, thus making it hard to use them in recommender systems. The approach presented in this paper clusters items according to their popularities, so that the recommendations for tail items are based on the ratings in more intensively clustered groups and for the head items are based on the ratings of individual items or groups, clustered to a lesser extent. We apply this method to two real-life datasets and compare the results with those of the non-grouping and fully grouped methods in terms of recommendation accuracy and scalability. The results show that if such adaptive clustering is done properly, this method reduces the recommendation error rates for the tail items, while maintaining reasonable computational performance.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.119")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Harnessing Folksonomies to Produce a Social Classification of Resources") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.115") (description nil "In our daily lives, organizing resources like books or web pages into a set of categories to ease future access is a common task. The usual largeness of these collections requires a vast endeavor and an outrageous expense to organize manually. As an approach to effectively produce an automated classification of resources, we consider the immense amounts of annotations provided by users on social tagging systems in the form of bookmarks. In this paper, we deal with the utilization of these user-provided tags to perform a social classification of resources. For this purpose, we have created three large-scale social tagging datasets including tagging data for different types of resources, web pages and books. Those resources are accompanied by categorization data from sound expert-driven taxonomies. We analyze the characteristics of the three social tagging systems, and perform an analysis on the usefulness of social tags to perform a social classification of resources that resembles the classification by experts as much as possible. We analyze 6 different representations using tags, and compare to other data sources by using 3 different settings of SVM classifiers. Finally, we explore the appropriateness of combining different data sources with tags using classifier committees to best classify the resources.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.115")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: COSAC: A framework for COmbinatorial Statistical Analysis on Cloud") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.113") (description nil "In many scientific applications, it is critical to determine if there is a relationship between a combination of objects. The strength of such an association is typically computed using some statistical measures. In order not to miss any important associations, it is not uncommon to exhaustively enumerate all possible combinations of a certain size. However, discovering significant associations among hundreds of thousands or even millions of objects is a computationally-intensive job that typically takes days, if not weeks, to complete. In this paper, we propose a framework, COSAC, for such combinatorial statistical analysis for large-scale datasets over a MapReduce-based cloud computing platform. COSAC operates in two key phases: (a) In the distribution phase, a novel load balancing scheme distributes the combination enumeration tasks across the processing units; (b) In the statistical analysis phase, each unit optimizes the processing of the allocated combinations by salvaging computations that can be reused. COSAC also supports a more practical scenario where only a selected subset of objects need to be analyzed against all the objects. We have evaluated our framework on a cluster of more than 40 nodes. The experimental results show that our framework is computationally practical, efficient, scalable and flexible.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.113")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: On the Analytical Properties of High Dimensional Randomization") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.98") (description nil "In this paper, we will provide the first comprehensive analysis of the randomization method in the presence of public information, and the effects of high dimensionality on randomization. The goal is to examine the strengths and weaknesses of randomization and explore both the potential and the pitfalls of randomization in the presence of public information. The inclusion of public information in the theoretical analysis of the randomization method results in a number of interesting and insightful conclusions. (1) The privacy effects of randomization reduce rapidly with increasing dimensionality. With increasing dimensionality, no privacy is practically possible. (2) The properties of the underlying data set can affect the anonymity level of the randomization method. For example, natural properties of real data sets such as clustering improve the effectiveness of randomization. On the other hand, variations in data density of non-empty data localities and outliers create privacy preservation challenges for the randomization method. (3) The presence of public information makes the choice of perturbing distribution more critical than previously thought. In particular, Gaussian perturbations are significantly more effective than uniformly distributed perturbations for the high dimensional case. These insights are very useful for future research and design of the randomization method.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.98")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: CDAMA: Concealed Data Aggregation Scheme for Multiple Applications in Wireless Sensor Networks") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.94") (description nil "For wireless sensor networks, data aggregation schemes that reduce a large amount of transmission is the most practical technique. In previous studies, homomorphic encryptions have been applied to conceal communication during aggregation such that enciphered data can be aggregated algebraically without decryption. Since aggregators collect data without decryption, adversaries are not able to forge aggregated results by compromising them. However, these schemes are not satisfy multi-application environments. Second, these schemes become insecure in case some sensor nodes are compromised. Third, these schemes do not provide secure counting; thus, they may suffer unauthorized aggregation attacks. Therefore, we propose a new concealed data aggregation scheme extended from Boneh et al.'s homomorphic public encryption system. The proposed scheme has three contributions. First, it is designed for a multi-application environment. The base station extracts application-specific data from aggregated ciphertexts. Next, it mitigates the impact of compromising attacks in single application environments. Finally, it degrades the damage from unauthorized aggregations. To prove the proposed scheme's robustness and efficiency, we also conducted the comprehensive analyses and comparisons in the end.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.94")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Achieving Data Privacy through Secrecy Views and Null-Based Virtual Updates") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.86") (description nil "We may want to keep sensitive information in a relational database hidden from a user or group thereof. We characterize sensitive data as the extensions of secrecy views. The database, before returning the answers to a query posed by a restricted user, is updated to make the secrecy views empty or a single tuple with null values. Then, a query about any of those views returns no meaningful information. Since the database is not supposed to be physically changed for this purpose, the updates are only virtual, and also minimal. Minimality makes sure that query answers, while being privacy preserving, are also maximally informative. The virtual updates are based on null values as used in the SQL standard. We provide the semantics of secrecy views, virtual updates, and secret answers to queries. The different instances resulting from the virtually updates are specified as the models of a logic program with stable model semantics, which becomes the basis for computation of the secret answers.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.86")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Distributed Strategies for Mining Outliers in Large Data Sets") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.71") (description nil "In this work we introduce a distributed method for detecting distance-based outliers in very large data sets. Our approach is based on the concept of outlier detection solving set [2], which is a small subset of the data set that can be also employed for predicting novel outliers. The method exploits parallel computation in order to obtain vast time savings. Indeed, beyond preserving the correctness of the result, the proposed schema exhibits excellent performances. From the theoretical point of view, for common settings, the temporal cost of our algorithm is expected to be at least three order of magnitude faster than the classical nested-loop like approach to detect outliers. Experimental results show that the algorithm is efficient and that its running time scales quite well for increasing number of nodes. We discuss also a variant of the basic strategy which reduces the amount of data to be transferred in order to improve both the communication cost and the overall run time. Importantly, the solving set computed by our approach in distributed environment has the same quality as that produced by the corresponding centralized method.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.71")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Crowdsourced Trace Similarity with Smartphones") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.55") (description nil "Smartphones are nowadays equipped with a number of sensors, such as WiFi, GPS, accelerometers, etc. This capability allows smartphone users to easily engage in crowdsourced computing services, which contribute to the solution of complex problems in a distributed manner. In this work, we leverage such a computing paradigm to solve efficiently the following problem: comparing a query trace Q against a crowd of traces generated and stored on distributed smartphones. Our proposed framework, coined SmartTrace+, provides an effective solution without disclosing any part of the crowd traces to the query processor. SmartTrace+, relies on an in-situ data storage model and intelligent top-K query processing algorithms that exploit distributed trajectory similarity measures, resilient to spatial and temporal noise, in order to derive the most relevant answers to Q. We evaluate our algorithms on both synthetic and real workloads. We describe our prototype system developed on the Android OS. The solution is deployed over our own SmartLab testbed of 25 smartphones. Our study reveals that computations over SmartTrace+ result in substantial energy conservation; in addition, results can be computed faster than competitive approaches.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.55")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Determining k-Most Demanding Products with Maximum Expected Number of Total Customers") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.53") (description nil "In this paper, a problem of production plans, named k-Most Demanding Products discovering, is formulated. Given a set of customers demanding a certain type of products with multiple attributes, a set of existing products of the type, a set of candidate products which can be offered by a company, and a positive integer k, we want to help the company to select k products from the candidate products such that the expected number of the total customers for the k products is maximized. We show the problem is NP-hard when the number of attributes for a product is 3 or more. One greedy algorithm is proposed to find approximate solution for the problem. We also attempt to find the optimal solution of the problem by estimating the upper bound of the expected number of the total customers for a set of k candidate products for reducing the search space of the optimal solution. An exact algorithm is then provided to find the optimal solution of the problem by using this pruning strategy. The experiment results demonstrate that both the efficiency and memory requirement of the exact algorithm are comparable to those for the greedy algorithm, and the greedy algorithm is well scalable with respect to k.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.53")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Co-Occurrence Based Diffusion for Expert Search On the Web") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.49") (description nil "Expert search has been studied in different contexts, e.g. enterprises, academic communities. We examine a general expert search problem: searching experts on the Web, where millions of Web pages and thousands of names are considered. It has mainly two challenging issues: (1) Web pages could be of varying quality and full of noises; (2) The expertise evidences scattered in Web pages are usually vague and ambiguous. We propose to leverage the large amount of co-occurrence information to assess relevance and reputation of a person name for a query topic. The co-occurrence structure is modeled using a hypergraph, on which a heat diffusion based ranking algorithm is proposed. Query keywords are regarded as heat sources, and a person name which has strong connection with the query (i.e. frequently co-occur with query keywords and co-occur with other names related to query keywords) will receive most of the heat, thus being ranked high. Experiments on the ClueWeb09 Web collection show that our algorithm is effective for retrieving experts and outperforms baseline algorithms significantly. This work would be regarded as one step towards addressing the more general entity search problem without sophisticated NLP techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.49")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Update Summarization via Graph-Based Sentence Ranking") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.42") (description nil "Due to the fast evolution of the information on the Internet, update summarization has received much attention in recent years. It is to summarize an evolutionary document collection at current time supposing the users have read some related previous documents. In this article, we propose a graph-ranking based method. It performs constrained reinforcements on a sentence graph, which unifies previous and current documents, to determine the salience of the sentences. The constraints ensure that the most salient sentences in current documents are updates to previous documents. Since this method is NP-hard, we then propose its approximate method, which is polynomial time solvable. Experiments on the TAC 2008 and 2009 benchmark data sets show the effectiveness and efficiency of our method.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.42")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Optimal Route Queries with Arbitrary Order Constraints") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.36") (description nil "Given a set of spatial points DS, each of which is associated with categorical information, e.g., restaurant, pub, etc., the optimal route query finds the shortest path that starts from the query point (e.g., a home or hotel), and covers a user-specified set of categories. The user may also specify partial order constraints between different categories. Previous work has focused on a special case where the query contains the total order of all categories to be visited. For the general scenario without such a total order, the only known solution reduces the problem to multiple, total-order optimal route queries. As we show in this paper, this naive approach incurs a significant amount of repeated computations, and, thus, is not scalable to large datasets. Motivated by this, we propose novel solutions to the general optimal route query, based on two different methodologies, namely backward search and forward search. In addition, we discuss how the proposed methods can be adapted to answer a variant of the optimal route queries, in which the route only needs to cover a subset of the given categories. Extensive experiments, using both real and synthetic datasets, confirm that the proposed solutions are efficient and practical, and outperform existing methods by large margins.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.36")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Improving Word Similarity by Augmenting PMI with Estimates of Word Polysemy") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.30") (description nil "Pointwise mutual information (PMI) is a widely used word similarity measure, but it lacks a clear explanation of how it works. We explore how PMI differs from distributional similarity, and we introduce a novel metric, PMI_max, that augments PMI with information about a word's number of senses. The coefficients of PMI_max are determined empirically by maximizing a utility function based on the performance of automatic thesaurus generation. We show that it outperforms traditional PMI in the application of automatic thesaurus generation and in two word similarity benchmark tasks: human similarity ratings and TOEFL synonym questions. PMI_max achieves a correlation coefficient comparable to the best knowledge-based approaches on the Miller-Charles similarity rating dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.30")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Survival Modeling Approach to Biomedical Search Result Diversification Using Wikipedia") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.24") (description nil "In this paper, we propose a survival modeling approach to promoting ranking diversity for biomedical information retrieval. The proposed approach concerns with finding relevant documents that can deliver more different aspects of a query. First, two probabilistic models derived from the survival analysis theory are proposed for measuring aspect novelty. Second, a new method using Wikipedia to detect aspects covered by retrieved documents is presented. Third, an aspect filter based on a two-stage model is introduced. It ranks the detected aspects in decreasing order of the probability that an aspect is generated by the query. Finally, the relevance and the novelty of retrieved documents are combined at the aspect level for re-ranking. Experiments conducted on the TREC 2006 and 2007 Genomics collections demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach in promoting ranking diversity for biomedical information retrieval. Moreover, we further evaluate our approach in the Web retrieval environment. The evaluation results on the ClueWeb09-T09B collection show that our approach can achieve promising performance improvements.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.24")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Information-Theoretic Outlier Detection for Large-Scale Categorical Data") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.261") (description nil "Outlier detection can usually be considered as a pre-processing step for locating, in a dataset, those objects that do not conform to well-defined notions of expected behavior. It is very important in data mining for discovering novel or rare events, anomalies, vicious actions, exceptional phenomena, etc. We are investigating outlier detection for categorical datasets. This problem is especially challenging because of the difficulty of defining a meaningful similarity measure for categorical data. In this paper, we propose a formal definition of outliers and an optimization model of outlier detection, via a new concept of holo-entropy that takes both entropy and total correlation into consideration. Based on this model, we define a function for the outlier factor of an object which is solely determined by the object itself and can be updated efficiently. We propose two practical 1-parameter outlier detection methods, named ITB-SS and ITB-SP, which require no user-defined parameters for deciding whether an object is an outlier. Users need only provide the number of outliers they want to detect. Experimental results show that ITB-SS and ITB-SP are more effective and efficient than mainstream methods and can be used to deal with both large and high-dimensional datasets where existing algorithms fail.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.261")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Protecting Sensitive Labels in Social Network Data Anonymization") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.259") (description nil "Privacy is one of the major concerns when publishing or sharing social network data for social science research and business analysis. Recently, researchers have developed privacy models similar to $k$-anonymity to prevent node re-identification through structure information. However, even when these privacy models are enforced, an attacker may still be able to infer one's private information if a group of nodes largely share the same sensitive labels (i.e., attributes). In other words, the label-node relationship is not well protected by pure structure anonymization methods. Furthermore, existing approaches, which rely on edge editing or node clustering and merging, may significantly alter key graph properties. In this paper, we define a $k$-degree-$l$-diversity anonymity model that considers the protection of structural information as well as sensitive labels of individuals. We further propose a novel anonymization methodology based on adding noise nodes. We develop several algorithms to add noise nodes into the original graph with the consideration of introducing the least distortion to graph properties. Most importantly, we provide a rigorous analysis of the theoretical upper bound on the number of noise nodes added and their impacts on important graph properties. We conduct extensive experiments to evaluate the effectiveness of the proposed technique.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.259")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Transfer Across Completely Different Feature Spaces via Spectral Embedding") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.252") (description nil "In many applications, it is difficult to obtain a lot of labeled examples. One practically important problem is: can the labeled data from other related sources help predict the target task, even if they have (a) different feature spaces (e.g., image vs. text data), (b) different data distributions, and (c) different output spaces? This paper proposes a solution and discusses the conditions where this is highly likely to produce better results. It first unifies the feature spaces of the target and source data sets by spectral embedding, even when they are with completely different feature spaces. The principle is to devise an optimization objective that preserves the original structure of the data, while at the same time, maximizes the similarity between the two. A linear projection model, as well as a non-linear approach are derived on the basis of this principle with closed forms. Second, a judicious sample selection strategy is applied to select only those related source examples. At last, a Bayesian-based approach is applied to model the relationship between different output spaces. The three steps can bridge related heterogeneous sources in order to learn the target task. Among the 20 experiment data sets, the proposed models can reduce the error rate by as much as 50%.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.252")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A New Algorithm for Inferring User Search Goals with Feedback Sessions") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.248") (description nil "For a broad-topic and ambiguous query, different users may have different search goals when they submit it to a search engine. The inference and analysis of user search goals can be very useful in improving search engine relevance and user experience. In this paper, we propose a novel approach to infer user search goals by analyzing search engine query logs. Firstly, we propose a framework to discover different user search goals for a query by clustering the proposed feedback sessions. Feedback sessions are constructed from user click-through logs and can efficiently reflect the information needs of users. Secondly, we propose a novel approach to generate pseudo-documents to better represent the feedback sessions for clustering. Finally, we propose a new criterion 'Classified Average Precision (CAP)' to evaluate the performance of inferring user search goals. Experimental results are presented using user click-through logs from a commercial search engine to validate the effectiveness of our proposed methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.248")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Fuzzy Web Data Tables Integration Guided by an Ontological and Terminological Resource") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.245") (description nil "In this paper, we present the design of the ONDINE system which allows the loading and the querying of a data warehouse opened on the Web, guided by a domain Termino-Ontological Resource (TOR). The data warehouse, composed of data tables extracted from Web documents, has been built to supplement existing local data sources. First we present the main steps of our semi-automatic method to annotate Web data tables driven by a domain TOR. The output of this method is an XML/RDF data warehouse composed of XML documents representing Web data tables with their fuzzy RDF annotations. We then present our flexible querying system which allows the local data sources and the XML/RDF data warehouse to be simultaneously and uniformly queried, using the domain TOR. This system relies on SPARQL and permits to retrieve approximate answers extracted from Web data tables by comparing preferences, expressed in selection criteria using fuzzy sets, with fuzzy RDF annotations.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.245")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Radio Database Compression for Accurate Energy-Efficient Localization in Fingerprinting Systems") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.241") (description nil "Location fingerprinting is a positioning method that exploits the already existing infrastructures such as cellular networks or WLANs. Regarding the recent demand for energy efficient networks and the emergence of issues like green networking, we propose a clustering technique to compress the radio database in the context of cellular fingerprinting systems. The aim of the proposed technique is to reduce the computation cost and transmission load in the mobile-based implementations. The presented method may be called Block-based Weighted Clustering (BWC) technique, which is applied in a concatenated location-radio signal space, and attributes different weight factors to the location and radio components. Computer simulations and real experiments have been conducted to evaluate the performance of our proposed technique in the context of a GSM network. The obtained results confirm the efficiency of the BWC technique, and show that it improves the performance of standard k-means and hierarchical clustering methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.241")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Facilitating Effective User Navigation through Web Site Structure Improvement") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.238") (description nil "Designing well-structured Web sites to facilitate effective user navigation has long been a challenge. A primary reason is that the Web developers' understanding of how a Web site should be structured can be considerably different from that of the users. While various methods have been proposed to re-link Web pages to improve navigability using user navigation data, the completely reorganized new structure can be highly unpredictable, and the cost of disorienting users after the changes remains unanalyzed. This paper addresses how to improve a Web site without introducing substantial changes. Specifically, we propose a mathematical programming model to improve the user navigation on a Web site while minimizing alterations to its current structure. Results from extensive tests conducted on a publicly available real data set indicate that our model not only significantly improves the user navigation with very few changes, but also can be effectively solved. We have also tested the model on large synthetic data sets to demonstrate that it scales up very well. In addition, we define two evaluation metrics and use them to assess the performance of the improved Web site using the real data set. Evaluation results confirm that the user navigation on the improved structure is indeed greatly enhanced.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.238")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Range-Based Skyline Queries in Mobile Environments") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.229") (description nil "Skyline query processing in location-based services, which considers both spatial and non-spatial attributes of the objects being queried, has recently received increasing attention. Existing solutions focus on solving point- or line-based skyline queries, in which the query location is an exact location point or a line segment. However, due to privacy consideration and limited precision of localization devices, the input of a user location is often a two-dimensional range. This paper studies a new problem on how to process such range-based skyline queries. Two novel algorithms are proposed: one is index-based (I-SKY) and the other is not based on any index (N-SKY). To handle frequent movements of the objects being queried, we also propose incremental versions of I-SKY and N-SKY, which avoid recomputing the query index and results from scratch. Additionally, we develop efficient solutions for probabilistic and continuous range-based skyline queries. Experimental results show that our proposed algorithms well outperform the baseline algorithm that simply adopts the existing line-based skyline solution. Moreover, the incremental versions of I-SKY and N-SKY save substantial computation costs, especially when the objects move frequently.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.229")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Building a Scalable Database-Driven Reverse Dictionary") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.225") (description nil "In this paper, we describe the design and implementation of a reverse dictionary. Unlike a traditional forward dictionary, which maps from words to their definitions, a reverse dictionary takes a user input phrase describing the desired concept, and returns a set of candidate words that satisfy the input phrase. This work has significant application not only for the general public, particularly those who work closely with words, but also in the general field of conceptual search. We present a set of algorithms and the results of a set of experiments showing the retrieval accuracy of our methods and the runtime response time performance of our implementation. Our experimental results show that our approach can provide significant improvements in performance scale without sacrificing the quality of the result. Our experiments comparing the quality of our approach to that of currently available reverse dictionaries show that of our approach can provide significantly higher quality over either of the other currently-available implementations.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.225")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Mining User Queries with Markov Chains: Application to Online Image Retrieval.") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.219") (description nil "We propose a novel method for automatic annotation, indexing and annotation-based retrieval of images. The new method, that we call Markovian Semantic Indexing (MSI), is presented in the context of an online image retrieval system. Assuming such a system, the users' queries are used to construct an \\textit{Aggregate Markov Chain} ($AMC$) through which the relevance between the keywords seen by the system is defined. The users' queries are also used to automatically annotate the images. A stochastic distance between images, based on their annotation and the keyword relevance captured in the $AMC$, is then introduced. Geometric interpretations of the proposed distance are provided and its relation to a clustering in the keyword space is investigated. By means of a new measure of Markovian state similarity, the \\textit{mean first cross passage time} ($CPT$), optimality properties of the proposed distance are proved. Images are modeled as points in a vector space and their similarity is measured with MSI. The new method is shown to possess certain theoretical advantages and also to achieve better Precision vs Recall results when compared to Latent Semantic Indexing (LSI) and probabilistic Latent Semantic Indexing (pLSI) methods in Annotation Based Image Retrieval (ABIR) tasks.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.219")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Rough Hypercuboid Approach for Feature Selection in Approximation Spaces") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.242") (description nil "The selection of relevant and significant features is an important problem particularly for data sets with large number of features. In this regard, a new feature selection algorithm is presented based on rough hypercuboid approach. It selects a set of features from a data set by maximizing the relevance, dependency, and significance of the selected features. By introducing the concept of hypercuboid equivalence partition matrix, a novel representation of degree of dependency of sample categories on features is proposed to measure the relevance, dependency, and significance of features in approximation spaces. The equivalence partition matrix also offers an efficient way to calculate many more quantitative measures to describe the inexactness of approximate classification. Several quantitative indices are introduced based on rough hypercuboid approach for evaluating the performance of proposed method. The superiority of the proposed method over other feature selection methods, in terms of computational complexity and classification accuracy, is established extensively on various real life data sets of different sizes and dimensions.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.242")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Signature-Based Detection of Notable Transitions in Numeric Data Streams") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.241") (description nil "A major challenge in large-scale process monitoring is to recognise significant transitions in the process conditions and to distinguish them from random fluctuations that do not produce a notable change in the process dynamics. Such transitions should be recognised at the early stages of their development using a minimal \"snapshot\" of the observable process log. We consider a novel approach to detecting notable transitions based on analysis of coherent behavior of frequency components in the process log (coherency portraits). We have found that notable transitions in the process dynamics are characterised by unique coherency portraits, which are also invariant with respect to the random process fluctuations. Our experimental study demonstrates the significant efficiency of our approach as compared to traditional change detection techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.241")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Mining Weakly-Labeled Web Facial Images for Search-Based Face Annotation") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.240") (description nil "This paper investigates a framework of Search-Based Face Annotation (SBFA) by mining weakly-labeled facial images that are freely available on the World Wide Web (WWW). One challenging problem for search-based face annotation scheme is how to effectively perform annotation by exploiting the list of most similar facial images and their weak labels that are often noisy and incomplete. To tackle this problem, we propose an effective Unsupervised Label Refinement (ULR) approach for refining the labels of web facial images using machine learning techniques. We formulate the learning problem as a convex optimization and develop effective optimization algorithms to solve the large-scale learning task efficiently. To further speed up the proposed scheme, we also propose a clustering-based approximation algorithm which can improve the scalability considerably. We have conducted an extensive set of empirical studies on a large-scale web facial image testbed, in which encouraging results showed that the proposed ULR algorithms can significantly boost the performance of the promising SBFA scheme.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.240")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Discovering Emerging Topics in Social Streams via Link Anomaly Detection") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.239") (description nil "Detection of emerging topics is now receiving renewed interest motivated by the rapid growth of social networks. Conventional term-frequency-based approaches may not be appropriate in this context, because the information exchanged in social-network posts include not only text but also images, URLs, and videos. We focus on emergence of topics signaled by social aspects of theses networks. Specifically, we focus on mentions of users -- links between users that are generated dynamically (intentionally or unintentionally) through replies, mentions, and retweets. We propose a probability model of the mentioning behaviour of a social network user, and propose to detect the emergence of a new topic from the anomalies measured through the model. Aggregating anomaly scores from hundreds of users, we show that we can detect emerging topics only based on the reply/mention relationships in social network posts. We demonstrate our technique in several real data sets we gathered from Twitter. The experiments show that the proposed mention-anomaly-based approaches can detect new topics at least as early as text-anomaly-based approaches, and in some cases much earlier when the topic is poorly identified by the textual contents in posts.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.239")) (item nil (title nil "IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering - Jan. 2013 (Vol. 25, No. 1)") (link nil "http://www.computer.org/portal/site/tkde/") (description nil "IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://www.computer.org/portal/site/tkde/")))) ("PrePrint: Multidimensional Sequence Classification based on Fuzzy Distances and Discriminant Analysis" "In this paper, we present a novel method aiming at multidimensional sequence classification. We propose a novel sequence representation, based on its fuzzy distances from optimal representative signal instances, called statemes. We also propose a novel modified Clustering Discriminant Analysis algorithm minimizing the adopted criterion with respect to both the data projection matrix and the class representation, leading to the optimal discriminant sequence class representation in a low-dimensional space, respectively. Based on this representation, simple classification algorithms, such as the nearest subclass centroid, provide high classification accuracy. A three step iterative optimization procedure for choosing statemes, optimal discriminant sub-space and optimal sequence class representation in the final decision space is proposed. The classification procedure is fast and accurate. The proposed method has been tested on a wide variety of multidimensional sequence classification problems, including handwritten character recognition, time series classification and human activity recognition, providing very satisfactory classification results." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.223" (20681 64082 756672) new 1 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Multidimensional Sequence Classification based on Fuzzy Distances and Discriminant Analysis") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.223") (description nil "In this paper, we present a novel method aiming at multidimensional sequence classification. We propose a novel sequence representation, based on its fuzzy distances from optimal representative signal instances, called statemes. We also propose a novel modified Clustering Discriminant Analysis algorithm minimizing the adopted criterion with respect to both the data projection matrix and the class representation, leading to the optimal discriminant sequence class representation in a low-dimensional space, respectively. Based on this representation, simple classification algorithms, such as the nearest subclass centroid, provide high classification accuracy. A three step iterative optimization procedure for choosing statemes, optimal discriminant sub-space and optimal sequence class representation in the final decision space is proposed. The classification procedure is fast and accurate. The proposed method has been tested on a wide variety of multidimensional sequence classification problems, including handwritten character recognition, time series classification and human activity recognition, providing very satisfactory classification results.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.223"))) ("PrePrint: A Cocktail Approach for Travel Package Recommendation" "This paper provides a study of exploiting online travel information for personalized travel package recommendation. A critical challenge along this line is to address the unique characteristics of travel data, which distinguish travel packages from traditional items for recommendation. To that end, we first analyze the characteristics of the travel packages and develop a Tourist-Area-Season Topic (TAST) model. This TAST model can represent travel packages and tourists by topic distributions, where the topic extraction is conditioned on both the tourists and the intrinsic features of the landscapes. Then, based on this representation, we propose a cocktail approach to generate the lists for personalized travel package recommendation. Furthermore, we extend the TAST model to the Tourist-Relation-Area-Season Topic (TRAST) model for capturing the latent relationships among the tourists in each travel group. Finally, we evaluate the TAST model, the TRAST model, and the cocktail recommendation approach on the real-world travel package data. Experimental results show that the TAST model can effectively capture the unique characteristics of the travel data and the cocktail approach is thus much more effective than traditional recommendation techniques for travel package recommendation. Also, the TRAST model can be used as an effective assessment for travel group formation." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.233" (20681 64082 756672) new 2 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Cocktail Approach for Travel Package Recommendation") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.233") (description nil "This paper provides a study of exploiting online travel information for personalized travel package recommendation. A critical challenge along this line is to address the unique characteristics of travel data, which distinguish travel packages from traditional items for recommendation. To that end, we first analyze the characteristics of the travel packages and develop a Tourist-Area-Season Topic (TAST) model. This TAST model can represent travel packages and tourists by topic distributions, where the topic extraction is conditioned on both the tourists and the intrinsic features of the landscapes. Then, based on this representation, we propose a cocktail approach to generate the lists for personalized travel package recommendation. Furthermore, we extend the TAST model to the Tourist-Relation-Area-Season Topic (TRAST) model for capturing the latent relationships among the tourists in each travel group. Finally, we evaluate the TAST model, the TRAST model, and the cocktail recommendation approach on the real-world travel package data. Experimental results show that the TAST model can effectively capture the unique characteristics of the travel data and the cocktail approach is thus much more effective than traditional recommendation techniques for travel package recommendation. Also, the TRAST model can be used as an effective assessment for travel group formation.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.233"))) ("PrePrint: Learning Conditional Preference Networks From Inconsistent Examples" "The problem of learning Conditional Preference Networks(CP-nets) from a set of examples has received great attention recently. However, because of the randomicity of the users' behaviors and the observation errors, there is always some noise making the examples inconsistent, namely, there exists at least one outcome preferred over itself (by transferring) in examples. Existing CP-nets learning methods can not handle inconsistent examples. In this work, we introduce the model of learning consistent CP-nets from inconsistent examples and present a method to solve this model. We do not learn the CP-nets directly. Instead, we first learn a preference graph from the inconsistent examples, because dominance testing and consistency testing in preference graphs are easier than those in CP-nets. The problem of learning preference graphs is translated into a 0-1 programming and is solved by the branch-and-bound search. Then the obtained preference graph is transformed into a CP-net equivalently , which can entail a subset of examples with maximal sum of weight. Examples are given to show that our method can obtain consistent CP-nets over both binary and multivalued variables from inconsistent examples. The proposed method is verified on both simulated data and real data, and it is also compared with existing methods." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.231" (20681 64082 756672) new 3 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Learning Conditional Preference Networks From Inconsistent Examples") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.231") (description nil "The problem of learning Conditional Preference Networks(CP-nets) from a set of examples has received great attention recently. However, because of the randomicity of the users' behaviors and the observation errors, there is always some noise making the examples inconsistent, namely, there exists at least one outcome preferred over itself (by transferring) in examples. Existing CP-nets learning methods can not handle inconsistent examples. In this work, we introduce the model of learning consistent CP-nets from inconsistent examples and present a method to solve this model. We do not learn the CP-nets directly. Instead, we first learn a preference graph from the inconsistent examples, because dominance testing and consistency testing in preference graphs are easier than those in CP-nets. The problem of learning preference graphs is translated into a 0-1 programming and is solved by the branch-and-bound search. Then the obtained preference graph is transformed into a CP-net equivalently , which can entail a subset of examples with maximal sum of weight. Examples are given to show that our method can obtain consistent CP-nets over both binary and multivalued variables from inconsistent examples. The proposed method is verified on both simulated data and real data, and it is also compared with existing methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.231"))) ("PrePrint: Effective Online Group Discovery in Trajectory Databases" "GPS-enabled devices are pervasive nowadays. Finding movement patterns in trajectory data stream is gaining in importance. We propose a group discovery framework that aims to efficiently support the online discovery of moving objects that travel together. The framework adopts a sampling-independent approach that makes no assumptions about when positions are sampled, gives no special importance to sampling points, and naturally supports the use of approximate trajectories. The framework's algorithms exploit state-of-the-art, density-based clustering (DBScan) to identify groups. The groups are scored based on their cardinality and duration, and the top-$k$ groups are returned. To avoid returning similar subgroups in a result, notions of domination and similarity are introduced that enable the pruning of low-interest groups. Empirical studies on real and synthetic data sets offer insight into the effectiveness and efficiency of the proposed framework." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.193" (20681 64082 756672) new 4 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Effective Online Group Discovery in Trajectory Databases") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.193") (description nil "GPS-enabled devices are pervasive nowadays. Finding movement patterns in trajectory data stream is gaining in importance. We propose a group discovery framework that aims to efficiently support the online discovery of moving objects that travel together. The framework adopts a sampling-independent approach that makes no assumptions about when positions are sampled, gives no special importance to sampling points, and naturally supports the use of approximate trajectories. The framework's algorithms exploit state-of-the-art, density-based clustering (DBScan) to identify groups. The groups are scored based on their cardinality and duration, and the top-$k$ groups are returned. To avoid returning similar subgroups in a result, notions of domination and similarity are introduced that enable the pruning of low-interest groups. Empirical studies on real and synthetic data sets offer insight into the effectiveness and efficiency of the proposed framework.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.193"))) ("PrePrint: Facilitating Document Annotation using Content and Querying Value" "A large number of organizations today generate and share textual descriptions of their products, services, and actions. Such collections of textual data contain significant amount of structured information, which remains buried in the unstructured text. While information extraction algorithms facilitate the extraction of structured relations, they are often expensive and inaccurate. We present a novel alternative approach that facilitates the generation of the structured metadata by identifying documents that are likely to contain information of interest and this information is going to be subsequently useful for querying the database. Our approach relies on the idea that humans are more likely to add the necessary metadata during creation time, if prompted by the interface; or that it is much easier for humans to identify the metadata when such information actually exists in the document, instead of naively prompting users to fill in forms with information that is not available in the document. We present algorithms that identify structured attributes that are likely to appear within the document, by jointly utilizing the content of the text and the query workload. Our experimental evaluation shows that our approach generates superior results compared to approaches that rely only on content or only on the query workload." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.224" (20681 64082 756672) new 5 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Facilitating Document Annotation using Content and Querying Value") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.224") (description nil "A large number of organizations today generate and share textual descriptions of their products, services, and actions. Such collections of textual data contain significant amount of structured information, which remains buried in the unstructured text. While information extraction algorithms facilitate the extraction of structured relations, they are often expensive and inaccurate. We present a novel alternative approach that facilitates the generation of the structured metadata by identifying documents that are likely to contain information of interest and this information is going to be subsequently useful for querying the database. Our approach relies on the idea that humans are more likely to add the necessary metadata during creation time, if prompted by the interface; or that it is much easier for humans to identify the metadata when such information actually exists in the document, instead of naively prompting users to fill in forms with information that is not available in the document. We present algorithms that identify structured attributes that are likely to appear within the document, by jointly utilizing the content of the text and the query workload. Our experimental evaluation shows that our approach generates superior results compared to approaches that rely only on content or only on the query workload.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.224"))) ("PrePrint: Practical Ensemble Classification Error Bounds for Different Operating Points" "Classification algorithms used to support the decisions of human analysts are often used in settings in which zero-one loss is not the appropriate indication of performance. The zero-one loss corresponds to the operating point with equal costs for false alarms and missed detections, and no option for the classifier to leave uncertain test samples unlabeled. A generalization bound for ensemble classification at the standard operating point has been developed based on two interpretable properties of the ensemble: strength and correlation, using the Chebyshev inequality. Such generalization bounds for other operating points have not been developed previously, and are developed in this paper. Significantly, the bounds are empirically shown to have much practical utility in determining optimal parameters for classification with a reject option, classification for ultra-low probability of false alarm, and classification for ultra-low probability of missed detection. Counter to the usual guideline of large strength and small correlation in the ensemble, different guidelines are recommended by the derived bounds in the ultra-low false alarm and missed detection probability regimes." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.219" (20681 64082 756672) new 6 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Practical Ensemble Classification Error Bounds for Different Operating Points") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.219") (description nil "Classification algorithms used to support the decisions of human analysts are often used in settings in which zero-one loss is not the appropriate indication of performance. The zero-one loss corresponds to the operating point with equal costs for false alarms and missed detections, and no option for the classifier to leave uncertain test samples unlabeled. A generalization bound for ensemble classification at the standard operating point has been developed based on two interpretable properties of the ensemble: strength and correlation, using the Chebyshev inequality. Such generalization bounds for other operating points have not been developed previously, and are developed in this paper. Significantly, the bounds are empirically shown to have much practical utility in determining optimal parameters for classification with a reject option, classification for ultra-low probability of false alarm, and classification for ultra-low probability of missed detection. Counter to the usual guideline of large strength and small correlation in the ensemble, different guidelines are recommended by the derived bounds in the ultra-low false alarm and missed detection probability regimes.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.219"))) ("PrePrint: Efficient Index-Based Approaches for Skyline Queries in Location-Based Applications" "Enriching many location-based applications, various new skyline queries are proposed and formulated based on the notion of locational dominance, which extends conventional one by taking objects&amp;#8217; nearness to query positions into account additional to objects&amp;#8217; non-spatial attributes. To answer a representative class of skyline queries for location-based applications efficiently, this paper presents two index-based approaches, namely, Augmented R-tree and Dominance Diagram. Augmented R-tree extends R-tree by including aggregated non-spatial attributes in index nodes to enable dominance checks during index traversal. Dominance Diagram is a solution-based approach, by which each object is associated with a precomputed non-dominance scope wherein query points should have the corresponding object not locationally dominated by any other. Dominance Diagram enables skyline queries to be evaluated via parallel and independent comparisons between non-dominance scopes and query points, providing very high search efficiency. The performance of these two approaches is evaluated via empirical studies, in comparison with other possible approaches." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.216" (20681 64082 756672) new 7 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Efficient Index-Based Approaches for Skyline Queries in Location-Based Applications") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.216") (description nil "Enriching many location-based applications, various new skyline queries are proposed and formulated based on the notion of locational dominance, which extends conventional one by taking objects&amp;#8217; nearness to query positions into account additional to objects&amp;#8217; non-spatial attributes. To answer a representative class of skyline queries for location-based applications efficiently, this paper presents two index-based approaches, namely, Augmented R-tree and Dominance Diagram. Augmented R-tree extends R-tree by including aggregated non-spatial attributes in index nodes to enable dominance checks during index traversal. Dominance Diagram is a solution-based approach, by which each object is associated with a precomputed non-dominance scope wherein query points should have the corresponding object not locationally dominated by any other. Dominance Diagram enables skyline queries to be evaluated via parallel and independent comparisons between non-dominance scopes and query points, providing very high search efficiency. The performance of these two approaches is evaluated via empirical studies, in comparison with other possible approaches.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.216"))) ("PrePrint: Supervised Multiple Kernel Embedding for Learning Predictive Subspaces" "For supervised learning problems, dimensionality reduction is generally applied as a preprocessing step. However, coupled training of dimensionality reduction and supervised learning steps may improve the prediction performance. In this paper, we propose a novel dimensionality reduction algorithm coupled with a supervised kernel-based learner, called supervised multiple kernel embedding, that integrates multiple kernel learning to dimensionality reduction and performs prediction on the projected subspace with a joint optimization framework. Combining multiple kernels allows us to combine different feature representations and/or similarity measures towards a unified subspace. We perform experiments on one digit recognition and two bioinformatics data sets. Our proposed method significantly outperforms multiple kernel Fisher discriminant analysis followed by a standard kernel-based learner, especially on low dimensions." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.213" (20681 64082 756672) new 8 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Supervised Multiple Kernel Embedding for Learning Predictive Subspaces") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.213") (description nil "For supervised learning problems, dimensionality reduction is generally applied as a preprocessing step. However, coupled training of dimensionality reduction and supervised learning steps may improve the prediction performance. In this paper, we propose a novel dimensionality reduction algorithm coupled with a supervised kernel-based learner, called supervised multiple kernel embedding, that integrates multiple kernel learning to dimensionality reduction and performs prediction on the projected subspace with a joint optimization framework. Combining multiple kernels allows us to combine different feature representations and/or similarity measures towards a unified subspace. We perform experiments on one digit recognition and two bioinformatics data sets. Our proposed method significantly outperforms multiple kernel Fisher discriminant analysis followed by a standard kernel-based learner, especially on low dimensions.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.213"))) ("PrePrint: Clustering Based on Enhanced &#x03B1;-Expansion Move" "The exemplar-based data clustering problem can be formulated as minimizing an energy function defined on a Markov random field (MRF). However, most algorithms for optimizing MRF energy function can&amp;#8217;t be directly applied to the task of clustering, as the problem has a high-order energy function. In this paper, we first show that the high order energy function for the clustering problem can be simplified as a pairwise energy function with the metric property, and consequently it can be optimized by the alpha-expansion move algorithm based on graph cut. Then, the original expansion move algorithm is improved in the following two aspects: (I) Instead of solving a minimal s-t graph cut problem, we show that there is an explicit and interpretable solution for minimizing the energy function in the clustering problem. Based on this interpretation, a fast alpha-expansion move algorithm is proposed, which is much more efficient than the graph cut based algorithm. (II) The fast alpha-expansion move algorithm is further improved by extending its move space so that a larger energy value reduction can be achieved in each iteration. Experiments on benchmark datasets show the enhanced expansion move algorithm has a better performance, compared to other state-of-the-art exemplar-based clustering algorithms." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.202" (20681 64082 756672) new 9 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Clustering Based on Enhanced &#x03B1;-Expansion Move") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.202") (description nil "The exemplar-based data clustering problem can be formulated as minimizing an energy function defined on a Markov random field (MRF). However, most algorithms for optimizing MRF energy function can&amp;#8217;t be directly applied to the task of clustering, as the problem has a high-order energy function. In this paper, we first show that the high order energy function for the clustering problem can be simplified as a pairwise energy function with the metric property, and consequently it can be optimized by the alpha-expansion move algorithm based on graph cut. Then, the original expansion move algorithm is improved in the following two aspects: (I) Instead of solving a minimal s-t graph cut problem, we show that there is an explicit and interpretable solution for minimizing the energy function in the clustering problem. Based on this interpretation, a fast alpha-expansion move algorithm is proposed, which is much more efficient than the graph cut based algorithm. (II) The fast alpha-expansion move algorithm is further improved by extending its move space so that a larger energy value reduction can be achieved in each iteration. Experiments on benchmark datasets show the enhanced expansion move algorithm has a better performance, compared to other state-of-the-art exemplar-based clustering algorithms.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.202"))) ("PrePrint: EnBay: A Novel Pattern-Based Bayesian Classifier" "A promising approach to Bayesian classification is based on exploiting frequent patterns, i.e., patterns that frequently occur in the training dataset, to estimate the Bayesian probability. Pattern-based Bayesian classification focuses on building and evaluating reliable probability approximations by exploiting a subset of frequent patterns tailored to a given test case. This paper proposes a novel and effective approach to estimate the Bayesian probability. Differently from previous approaches, the Entropy-based Bayesian classifier, namely EnBay, focuses on selecting the minimal set of long and not overlapped patterns that best complies with a conditional-independence model, based on an entropy-based evaluator. Furthermore, the probability approximation is separately tailored to each class. An extensive experimental evaluation, performed on both real and synthetic datasets, shows that EnBay is significantly more accurate than most state-of-the-art classifiers, Bayesian and not." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.197" (20681 64082 756672) new 10 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: EnBay: A Novel Pattern-Based Bayesian Classifier") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.197") (description nil "A promising approach to Bayesian classification is based on exploiting frequent patterns, i.e., patterns that frequently occur in the training dataset, to estimate the Bayesian probability. Pattern-based Bayesian classification focuses on building and evaluating reliable probability approximations by exploiting a subset of frequent patterns tailored to a given test case. This paper proposes a novel and effective approach to estimate the Bayesian probability. Differently from previous approaches, the Entropy-based Bayesian classifier, namely EnBay, focuses on selecting the minimal set of long and not overlapped patterns that best complies with a conditional-independence model, based on an entropy-based evaluator. Furthermore, the probability approximation is separately tailored to each class. An extensive experimental evaluation, performed on both real and synthetic datasets, shows that EnBay is significantly more accurate than most state-of-the-art classifiers, Bayesian and not.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.197"))) ("PrePrint: iLike: Bridging the Semantic Gap in Vertical Image Search by Integrating Text and Visual Features" "With the development of Internet and Web 2.0, large volume of multimedia content have been made online. It is highly desired to provide easy accessibility to such contents. Towards this goal, content-based image retrieval has been intensively studied in the research community, while text-based search is better adopted in the industry. Both approaches have inherent disadvantages and limitations. Therefore, unlike the great success of text search, Web image search engines are still premature. In this paper, we present iLike, a vertical image search engine which integrates textual and visual features to improve retrieval performance. We bridge the semantic gap by capturing the meaning of each text term in the visual feature space, and re-weight visual features according to their significance to the query terms. We also bridge the user intention gap since we are able to infer the \"visual meanings\" behind the textual queries. Last but not least, we provide a visual thesaurus, which is generated from the statistical similarity between the visual space representation of textual terms. Experimental results show that our approach improves both precision and recall, compared with content-based or text-based image retrieval techniques. More importantly, search results from iLike is more consistent with users' perception of the query terms." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.192" (20681 64082 756672) new 11 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: iLike: Bridging the Semantic Gap in Vertical Image Search by Integrating Text and Visual Features") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.192") (description nil "With the development of Internet and Web 2.0, large volume of multimedia content have been made online. It is highly desired to provide easy accessibility to such contents. Towards this goal, content-based image retrieval has been intensively studied in the research community, while text-based search is better adopted in the industry. Both approaches have inherent disadvantages and limitations. Therefore, unlike the great success of text search, Web image search engines are still premature. In this paper, we present iLike, a vertical image search engine which integrates textual and visual features to improve retrieval performance. We bridge the semantic gap by capturing the meaning of each text term in the visual feature space, and re-weight visual features according to their significance to the query terms. We also bridge the user intention gap since we are able to infer the \"visual meanings\" behind the textual queries. Last but not least, we provide a visual thesaurus, which is generated from the statistical similarity between the visual space representation of textual terms. Experimental results show that our approach improves both precision and recall, compared with content-based or text-based image retrieval techniques. More importantly, search results from iLike is more consistent with users' perception of the query terms.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.192"))) ("PrePrint: Efficient Cluster Labeling for Support Vector Clustering" "We propose a new efficient algorithm for solving the cluster labeling problem in Support Vector Clustering (SVC). The proposed algorithm analyzes the topology of the function describing the SVC cluster contours and explores interconnection paths between critical points separating distinct cluster contours. This process allows distinguishing disjoint clusters and associating each point to its respective one. The proposed algorithm implements a new fast method for detecting and classifying critical points while analyzing the interconnection patterns between them. Experiments indicate that the proposed algorithm significantly improve the accuracy of the SVC labeling process in the presence of clusters of complex shape, while reducing the processing time required by existing SVC labeling algorithms by orders of magnitude." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.190" (20681 64082 756672) new 12 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Efficient Cluster Labeling for Support Vector Clustering") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.190") (description nil "We propose a new efficient algorithm for solving the cluster labeling problem in Support Vector Clustering (SVC). The proposed algorithm analyzes the topology of the function describing the SVC cluster contours and explores interconnection paths between critical points separating distinct cluster contours. This process allows distinguishing disjoint clusters and associating each point to its respective one. The proposed algorithm implements a new fast method for detecting and classifying critical points while analyzing the interconnection patterns between them. Experiments indicate that the proposed algorithm significantly improve the accuracy of the SVC labeling process in the presence of clusters of complex shape, while reducing the processing time required by existing SVC labeling algorithms by orders of magnitude.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.190"))) ("PrePrint: A Family of Joint Sparse PCA Algorithms for Anomaly Localization in Network Data Streams" "Determining anomalies in data streams that are collected and transformed from various types of networks has recently attracted significant research interest. Principal Component Analysis (PCA) has been extensively applied to detecting anomalies in network data streams. However, none of existing PCA based approaches addresses the problem of identifying the sources that contribute most to the observed anomaly, or anomaly localization. In this paper, we propose novel sparse PCA methods to perform anomaly detection and localization for network data streams. Our key observation is that we can localize anomalies by identifying a sparse low dimensional space that captures the abnormal events in data streams. To better capture the sources of anomalies, we incorporate the structure information of the network stream data in our anomaly localization framework. Furthermore, we extend our joint sparse PCA framework with multi-dimensional Karhunen Lo`eve Expansion (KLE) that considers both spatial and temporal domains of data streams to stabilize localization performance.We have performed comprehensive experimental studies of the proposed methods, and have compared our methods with the state-of-the-art using three real-world data sets from different application domains. Our experimental studies demonstrate the utility of the proposed methods." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.176" (20681 64082 756672) new 13 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Family of Joint Sparse PCA Algorithms for Anomaly Localization in Network Data Streams") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.176") (description nil "Determining anomalies in data streams that are collected and transformed from various types of networks has recently attracted significant research interest. Principal Component Analysis (PCA) has been extensively applied to detecting anomalies in network data streams. However, none of existing PCA based approaches addresses the problem of identifying the sources that contribute most to the observed anomaly, or anomaly localization. In this paper, we propose novel sparse PCA methods to perform anomaly detection and localization for network data streams. Our key observation is that we can localize anomalies by identifying a sparse low dimensional space that captures the abnormal events in data streams. To better capture the sources of anomalies, we incorporate the structure information of the network stream data in our anomaly localization framework. Furthermore, we extend our joint sparse PCA framework with multi-dimensional Karhunen Lo`eve Expansion (KLE) that considers both spatial and temporal domains of data streams to stabilize localization performance.We have performed comprehensive experimental studies of the proposed methods, and have compared our methods with the state-of-the-art using three real-world data sets from different application domains. Our experimental studies demonstrate the utility of the proposed methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.176"))) ("PrePrint: Dealing with Uncertainty: A Survey of Theories and Practices" "Uncertainty accompanies our life processes, and covers almost all fields of scientific studies. Two general categories of uncertainty, namely, aleatory uncertainty and epistemic uncertainty, exist in the world. While aleatory uncertainty refers to the inherent randomness in nature, derived from natural variability of the physical world (e.g., random show of a flipped coin), epistemic uncertainty origins from human's lack of knowledge of the physical world, as well as ability of measuring and modeling the physical world (e.g., computation of the distance between two cities). Different kinds of uncertainty call for different handling methods. Aggarwal, Yu, Sarma, Zhang et al. have made good surveys on uncertain database management based on the probability theory. This paper reviews multi-disciplinary uncertainty processing activities in diverse fields. Beyond the dominant probability theory and fuzzy theory, we also review information-gap theory and recently derived uncertainty theory. Practices of these uncertainty handling theories in the domains of economics, engineering, ecology, and information sciences are also described. It is our hope that this study could provide insights to the database community on how uncertainty is managed in other disciplines; and further challenge and inspire database researchers to develop more advanced data management techniques and tools to cope with a variety of uncertainty issues in the real world." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.179" (20681 64082 756672) new 14 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Dealing with Uncertainty: A Survey of Theories and Practices") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.179") (description nil "Uncertainty accompanies our life processes, and covers almost all fields of scientific studies. Two general categories of uncertainty, namely, aleatory uncertainty and epistemic uncertainty, exist in the world. While aleatory uncertainty refers to the inherent randomness in nature, derived from natural variability of the physical world (e.g., random show of a flipped coin), epistemic uncertainty origins from human's lack of knowledge of the physical world, as well as ability of measuring and modeling the physical world (e.g., computation of the distance between two cities). Different kinds of uncertainty call for different handling methods. Aggarwal, Yu, Sarma, Zhang et al. have made good surveys on uncertain database management based on the probability theory. This paper reviews multi-disciplinary uncertainty processing activities in diverse fields. Beyond the dominant probability theory and fuzzy theory, we also review information-gap theory and recently derived uncertainty theory. Practices of these uncertainty handling theories in the domains of economics, engineering, ecology, and information sciences are also described. It is our hope that this study could provide insights to the database community on how uncertainty is managed in other disciplines; and further challenge and inspire database researchers to develop more advanced data management techniques and tools to cope with a variety of uncertainty issues in the real world.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.179"))) ("PrePrint: A Group Incremental Approach to Feature Selection Applying Rough Set Technique" "Many real data increase dynamically in size. This phenomena occurs in several fields including economics, population studies and medical research. As an effective and efficient mechanism to deal with such data, incremental technique has been proposed in the literature and attracted much attention, which stimulates the result in this paper. When a group of objects are added to a decision table, we first introduce incremental mechanisms for three representative information entropies and then develop a group incremental rough feature selection algorithm based on information entropy. When multiple objects are added to a decision table, the algorithm aims to find the new feature subset in a much shorter time. Experiments have been carried out on nine UCI data sets and the experimental results show that the algorithm is effective and efficient." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.146" (20681 64082 756672) new 15 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Group Incremental Approach to Feature Selection Applying Rough Set Technique") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.146") (description nil "Many real data increase dynamically in size. This phenomena occurs in several fields including economics, population studies and medical research. As an effective and efficient mechanism to deal with such data, incremental technique has been proposed in the literature and attracted much attention, which stimulates the result in this paper. When a group of objects are added to a decision table, we first introduce incremental mechanisms for three representative information entropies and then develop a group incremental rough feature selection algorithm based on information entropy. When multiple objects are added to a decision table, the algorithm aims to find the new feature subset in a much shorter time. Experiments have been carried out on nine UCI data sets and the experimental results show that the algorithm is effective and efficient.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.146"))) ("PrePrint: Towards the Automatic Extraction of Policy Networks using Web Links and Documents" "Policy networks are widely used by political scientists and economists to explain various financial and social phenomena, such as the development of partnerships between political entities or institutions from different levels of governance. The analysis of policy networks demands a series of arduous and time consuming manual steps including interviews and questionnaires. In this paper, we estimate the strength of relations between actors in policy networks using features extracted from data harvested from the web. Features include webpage counts, outlinks, and lexical information extracted from web documents or web snippets. The proposed approach is automatic and does not require any external knowledge source, other than the specification of the word forms that correspond to the political actors. The features are evaluated both in isolation and jointly for both positive and negative (antagonistic) actor relations. The proposed algorithms are evaluated on two EU policy networks from the political science literature. Performance is measured in terms of correlation and mean square error between the human rated and the automatically extracted relations. Correlation of up to 0.74 is achieved for positive relations. The extracted networks are validated by political scientists and useful conclusions about the evolution of the networks over time are drawn." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.159" (20681 64082 756672) new 16 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Towards the Automatic Extraction of Policy Networks using Web Links and Documents") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.159") (description nil "Policy networks are widely used by political scientists and economists to explain various financial and social phenomena, such as the development of partnerships between political entities or institutions from different levels of governance. The analysis of policy networks demands a series of arduous and time consuming manual steps including interviews and questionnaires. In this paper, we estimate the strength of relations between actors in policy networks using features extracted from data harvested from the web. Features include webpage counts, outlinks, and lexical information extracted from web documents or web snippets. The proposed approach is automatic and does not require any external knowledge source, other than the specification of the word forms that correspond to the political actors. The features are evaluated both in isolation and jointly for both positive and negative (antagonistic) actor relations. The proposed algorithms are evaluated on two EU policy networks from the political science literature. Performance is measured in terms of correlation and mean square error between the human rated and the automatically extracted relations. Correlation of up to 0.74 is achieved for positive relations. The extracted networks are validated by political scientists and useful conclusions about the evolution of the networks over time are drawn.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.159"))) ("PrePrint: Omnivariate Rule Induction Using a Novel Pairwise Statistical Test" "Rule learning algorithms, for example, Ripper, induces univariate rules, that is, a propositional condition in a rule uses only one feature. In this paper, we propose an omnivariate induction of rules where at each condition, both a univariate and a multivariate condition is trained and the best is chosen according to a novel statistical test. This paper has three main contributions: First, we propose a novel statistical test, the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test, to compare two classifiers, which is a variant of the 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test and give the connections to other tests as $5\\times 2$ cv $F$ test and $k$-fold paired $t$ test. Second, we propose a multivariate version of Ripper where Support Vector Machine (SVM) with linear kernel is used to find multivariate linear conditions. Third, we propose an omnivariate version of Ripper where the model selection is done via the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test. Our results indicate that (1) the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test has higher power (lower type II error), lower type I error, and higher replicability compared to the 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test, (2) omnivariate rules are better in that they choose whichever condition is more accurate, selecting the right model automatically and separately for each condition in a rule." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.155" (20681 64082 756672) new 17 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Omnivariate Rule Induction Using a Novel Pairwise Statistical Test") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.155") (description nil "Rule learning algorithms, for example, Ripper, induces univariate rules, that is, a propositional condition in a rule uses only one feature. In this paper, we propose an omnivariate induction of rules where at each condition, both a univariate and a multivariate condition is trained and the best is chosen according to a novel statistical test. This paper has three main contributions: First, we propose a novel statistical test, the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test, to compare two classifiers, which is a variant of the 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test and give the connections to other tests as $5\\times 2$ cv $F$ test and $k$-fold paired $t$ test. Second, we propose a multivariate version of Ripper where Support Vector Machine (SVM) with linear kernel is used to find multivariate linear conditions. Third, we propose an omnivariate version of Ripper where the model selection is done via the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test. Our results indicate that (1) the combined 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test has higher power (lower type II error), lower type I error, and higher replicability compared to the 5$\\times$2 cv $t$ test, (2) omnivariate rules are better in that they choose whichever condition is more accurate, selecting the right model automatically and separately for each condition in a rule.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.155"))) ("PrePrint: Optimizing Multi-Top-k Queries over Uncertain Data Streams" "Query processing over uncertain data streams, in particular top-$k$ query processing, has become increasingly important due to its wide application in many fields such as sensor network monitoring and internet traffic control. In many real applications, multiple top-$k$ queries are registered in the system. Sharing the results of these queries is a key factor in saving the computation cost and providing real time response. However, due to the complex semantics of uncertain top-$k$ query processing, it is nontrivial to implement sharing among different top-$k$ queries and few works have addressed the sharing issue. In this paper, we formulate various types of sharing among multiple top-$k$ queries over uncertain data streams based on the frequency upper bound of each top-$k$ query. We present an optimal dynamic programming solution as well as a more efficient (in terms of time and space complexity) greedy algorithm to compute the execution plan of executing queries for saving the computation cost between them. Experiments have demonstrated that the greedy algorithm can find the optimal solution in most cases, and it can almost achieve the same performance (in terms of latency and throughput) as the dynamic programming approach." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.126" (20681 64082 756672) new 18 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Optimizing Multi-Top-k Queries over Uncertain Data Streams") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.126") (description nil "Query processing over uncertain data streams, in particular top-$k$ query processing, has become increasingly important due to its wide application in many fields such as sensor network monitoring and internet traffic control. In many real applications, multiple top-$k$ queries are registered in the system. Sharing the results of these queries is a key factor in saving the computation cost and providing real time response. However, due to the complex semantics of uncertain top-$k$ query processing, it is nontrivial to implement sharing among different top-$k$ queries and few works have addressed the sharing issue. In this paper, we formulate various types of sharing among multiple top-$k$ queries over uncertain data streams based on the frequency upper bound of each top-$k$ query. We present an optimal dynamic programming solution as well as a more efficient (in terms of time and space complexity) greedy algorithm to compute the execution plan of executing queries for saving the computation cost between them. Experiments have demonstrated that the greedy algorithm can find the optimal solution in most cases, and it can almost achieve the same performance (in terms of latency and throughput) as the dynamic programming approach.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.126"))) ("PrePrint: NHOP: A Nested Associative Pattern for Analysis of Consensus Sequence Ensembles" "In this research, we introduce a novel, complex associative pattern that is found to be very useful because it identifies the core associative structure from the data. We refer to it as nested high-order pattern (or NHOP). The pattern is more specific than associative patterns represented as multiple variables. It also generalizes sequential patterns, as the outcomes need not be contiguous. This paper outlines two search algorithms, the r-Tree and Best-k algorithm in its detection. It was then applied to an analysis of biomolecule using the aligned sequence family of the molecule. In the SH3 protein, a model for protein-protein interaction mediator, we identify functional groups (core and binding sites) in the three-dimensional structure as well as amino acid patterns dominating certain species." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.151" (20681 64082 756672) new 19 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: NHOP: A Nested Associative Pattern for Analysis of Consensus Sequence Ensembles") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.151") (description nil "In this research, we introduce a novel, complex associative pattern that is found to be very useful because it identifies the core associative structure from the data. We refer to it as nested high-order pattern (or NHOP). The pattern is more specific than associative patterns represented as multiple variables. It also generalizes sequential patterns, as the outcomes need not be contiguous. This paper outlines two search algorithms, the r-Tree and Best-k algorithm in its detection. It was then applied to an analysis of biomolecule using the aligned sequence family of the molecule. In the SH3 protein, a model for protein-protein interaction mediator, we identify functional groups (core and binding sites) in the three-dimensional structure as well as amino acid patterns dominating certain species.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.151"))) ("PrePrint: Static and Dynamic Structural Correlations in Graphs" "Real-life graphs not only contain nodes and edges, but also have events taking place, e.g., product sales in social networks. Some events exhibit strong correlations with the network structure, while others do not. Such structural correlations will shed light on viral influence existing in the corresponding network. Unfortunately, the traditional association mining concept is not applicable in graphs since it only works on homogeneous datasets. We propose a novel measure for assessing structural correlations in graphs with events. The measure applies hitting time to aggregate the proximity among nodes that have the same event. In order to calculate correlation scores for many events in large networks, we develop a scalable framework, called gScore, using sampling and approximation. By comparing to the situation where events are randomly distributed in the network, our method is able to discover events that are highly correlated with the graph structure. We test gScore's effectiveness by synthetic events on the DBLP co-author network and report interesting correlation results in a social network extracted from TaoBao.com, the largest online shopping network in China. Scalability of gScore is tested on the Twitter network. We also propose a dynamic measure which can be used for discovering detailed evolutionary patterns." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.133" (20681 64082 756672) new 20 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Static and Dynamic Structural Correlations in Graphs") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.133") (description nil "Real-life graphs not only contain nodes and edges, but also have events taking place, e.g., product sales in social networks. Some events exhibit strong correlations with the network structure, while others do not. Such structural correlations will shed light on viral influence existing in the corresponding network. Unfortunately, the traditional association mining concept is not applicable in graphs since it only works on homogeneous datasets. We propose a novel measure for assessing structural correlations in graphs with events. The measure applies hitting time to aggregate the proximity among nodes that have the same event. In order to calculate correlation scores for many events in large networks, we develop a scalable framework, called gScore, using sampling and approximation. By comparing to the situation where events are randomly distributed in the network, our method is able to discover events that are highly correlated with the graph structure. We test gScore's effectiveness by synthetic events on the DBLP co-author network and report interesting correlation results in a social network extracted from TaoBao.com, the largest online shopping network in China. Scalability of gScore is tested on the Twitter network. We also propose a dynamic measure which can be used for discovering detailed evolutionary patterns.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.133"))) ("PrePrint: Latent Structured Perceptrons for Large-Scale Learning with Hidden Information" "Many real-world data mining problems contain hidden information (e.g., unobservable latent dependencies). We propose a perceptron-style method, latent structured perceptron, for fast discriminative learning of structured classification with hidden information. We also give theoretical analysis and demonstrate good convergence properties of the proposed method. Our method extends the perceptron algorithm for the learning task with hidden information, which can be hardly captured by traditional models. It relies on Viterbi decoding over latent variables, combined with simple additive updates. We perform experiments on one synthetic dataset and two real-world structured classification tasks. Compared to conventional non-latent models (e.g., conditional random fields, structured perceptrons), our method is significantly more accurate on real-world tasks. Compared to existing heavy probabilistic models of latent variables (e.g., latent conditional random fields), our method lowers the training cost significantly (almost one order magnitude faster) yet with comparable or even superior classification accuracy. In addition, experiments demonstrate that the proposed method has good scalability on large-scale problems." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.129" (20681 64082 756672) new 21 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Latent Structured Perceptrons for Large-Scale Learning with Hidden Information") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.129") (description nil "Many real-world data mining problems contain hidden information (e.g., unobservable latent dependencies). We propose a perceptron-style method, latent structured perceptron, for fast discriminative learning of structured classification with hidden information. We also give theoretical analysis and demonstrate good convergence properties of the proposed method. Our method extends the perceptron algorithm for the learning task with hidden information, which can be hardly captured by traditional models. It relies on Viterbi decoding over latent variables, combined with simple additive updates. We perform experiments on one synthetic dataset and two real-world structured classification tasks. Compared to conventional non-latent models (e.g., conditional random fields, structured perceptrons), our method is significantly more accurate on real-world tasks. Compared to existing heavy probabilistic models of latent variables (e.g., latent conditional random fields), our method lowers the training cost significantly (almost one order magnitude faster) yet with comparable or even superior classification accuracy. In addition, experiments demonstrate that the proposed method has good scalability on large-scale problems.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.129"))) ("PrePrint: The Adaptive Clustering Method for the Long Tail Problem of Recommender Systems" "This is a study of the long tail problem of recommender systems when many items in the long tail have only a few ratings, thus making it hard to use them in recommender systems. The approach presented in this paper clusters items according to their popularities, so that the recommendations for tail items are based on the ratings in more intensively clustered groups and for the head items are based on the ratings of individual items or groups, clustered to a lesser extent. We apply this method to two real-life datasets and compare the results with those of the non-grouping and fully grouped methods in terms of recommendation accuracy and scalability. The results show that if such adaptive clustering is done properly, this method reduces the recommendation error rates for the tail items, while maintaining reasonable computational performance." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.119" (20681 64082 756672) new 22 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: The Adaptive Clustering Method for the Long Tail Problem of Recommender Systems") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.119") (description nil "This is a study of the long tail problem of recommender systems when many items in the long tail have only a few ratings, thus making it hard to use them in recommender systems. The approach presented in this paper clusters items according to their popularities, so that the recommendations for tail items are based on the ratings in more intensively clustered groups and for the head items are based on the ratings of individual items or groups, clustered to a lesser extent. We apply this method to two real-life datasets and compare the results with those of the non-grouping and fully grouped methods in terms of recommendation accuracy and scalability. The results show that if such adaptive clustering is done properly, this method reduces the recommendation error rates for the tail items, while maintaining reasonable computational performance.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.119"))) ("PrePrint: Harnessing Folksonomies to Produce a Social Classification of Resources" "In our daily lives, organizing resources like books or web pages into a set of categories to ease future access is a common task. The usual largeness of these collections requires a vast endeavor and an outrageous expense to organize manually. As an approach to effectively produce an automated classification of resources, we consider the immense amounts of annotations provided by users on social tagging systems in the form of bookmarks. In this paper, we deal with the utilization of these user-provided tags to perform a social classification of resources. For this purpose, we have created three large-scale social tagging datasets including tagging data for different types of resources, web pages and books. Those resources are accompanied by categorization data from sound expert-driven taxonomies. We analyze the characteristics of the three social tagging systems, and perform an analysis on the usefulness of social tags to perform a social classification of resources that resembles the classification by experts as much as possible. We analyze 6 different representations using tags, and compare to other data sources by using 3 different settings of SVM classifiers. Finally, we explore the appropriateness of combining different data sources with tags using classifier committees to best classify the resources." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.115" (20681 64082 756672) new 23 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Harnessing Folksonomies to Produce a Social Classification of Resources") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.115") (description nil "In our daily lives, organizing resources like books or web pages into a set of categories to ease future access is a common task. The usual largeness of these collections requires a vast endeavor and an outrageous expense to organize manually. As an approach to effectively produce an automated classification of resources, we consider the immense amounts of annotations provided by users on social tagging systems in the form of bookmarks. In this paper, we deal with the utilization of these user-provided tags to perform a social classification of resources. For this purpose, we have created three large-scale social tagging datasets including tagging data for different types of resources, web pages and books. Those resources are accompanied by categorization data from sound expert-driven taxonomies. We analyze the characteristics of the three social tagging systems, and perform an analysis on the usefulness of social tags to perform a social classification of resources that resembles the classification by experts as much as possible. We analyze 6 different representations using tags, and compare to other data sources by using 3 different settings of SVM classifiers. Finally, we explore the appropriateness of combining different data sources with tags using classifier committees to best classify the resources.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.115"))) ("PrePrint: COSAC: A framework for COmbinatorial Statistical Analysis on Cloud" "In many scientific applications, it is critical to determine if there is a relationship between a combination of objects. The strength of such an association is typically computed using some statistical measures. In order not to miss any important associations, it is not uncommon to exhaustively enumerate all possible combinations of a certain size. However, discovering significant associations among hundreds of thousands or even millions of objects is a computationally-intensive job that typically takes days, if not weeks, to complete. In this paper, we propose a framework, COSAC, for such combinatorial statistical analysis for large-scale datasets over a MapReduce-based cloud computing platform. COSAC operates in two key phases: (a) In the distribution phase, a novel load balancing scheme distributes the combination enumeration tasks across the processing units; (b) In the statistical analysis phase, each unit optimizes the processing of the allocated combinations by salvaging computations that can be reused. COSAC also supports a more practical scenario where only a selected subset of objects need to be analyzed against all the objects. We have evaluated our framework on a cluster of more than 40 nodes. The experimental results show that our framework is computationally practical, efficient, scalable and flexible." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.113" (20681 64082 756672) new 24 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: COSAC: A framework for COmbinatorial Statistical Analysis on Cloud") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.113") (description nil "In many scientific applications, it is critical to determine if there is a relationship between a combination of objects. The strength of such an association is typically computed using some statistical measures. In order not to miss any important associations, it is not uncommon to exhaustively enumerate all possible combinations of a certain size. However, discovering significant associations among hundreds of thousands or even millions of objects is a computationally-intensive job that typically takes days, if not weeks, to complete. In this paper, we propose a framework, COSAC, for such combinatorial statistical analysis for large-scale datasets over a MapReduce-based cloud computing platform. COSAC operates in two key phases: (a) In the distribution phase, a novel load balancing scheme distributes the combination enumeration tasks across the processing units; (b) In the statistical analysis phase, each unit optimizes the processing of the allocated combinations by salvaging computations that can be reused. COSAC also supports a more practical scenario where only a selected subset of objects need to be analyzed against all the objects. We have evaluated our framework on a cluster of more than 40 nodes. The experimental results show that our framework is computationally practical, efficient, scalable and flexible.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.113"))) ("PrePrint: On the Analytical Properties of High Dimensional Randomization" "In this paper, we will provide the first comprehensive analysis of the randomization method in the presence of public information, and the effects of high dimensionality on randomization. The goal is to examine the strengths and weaknesses of randomization and explore both the potential and the pitfalls of randomization in the presence of public information. The inclusion of public information in the theoretical analysis of the randomization method results in a number of interesting and insightful conclusions. (1) The privacy effects of randomization reduce rapidly with increasing dimensionality. With increasing dimensionality, no privacy is practically possible. (2) The properties of the underlying data set can affect the anonymity level of the randomization method. For example, natural properties of real data sets such as clustering improve the effectiveness of randomization. On the other hand, variations in data density of non-empty data localities and outliers create privacy preservation challenges for the randomization method. (3) The presence of public information makes the choice of perturbing distribution more critical than previously thought. In particular, Gaussian perturbations are significantly more effective than uniformly distributed perturbations for the high dimensional case. These insights are very useful for future research and design of the randomization method." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.98" (20681 64082 756672) new 25 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: On the Analytical Properties of High Dimensional Randomization") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.98") (description nil "In this paper, we will provide the first comprehensive analysis of the randomization method in the presence of public information, and the effects of high dimensionality on randomization. The goal is to examine the strengths and weaknesses of randomization and explore both the potential and the pitfalls of randomization in the presence of public information. The inclusion of public information in the theoretical analysis of the randomization method results in a number of interesting and insightful conclusions. (1) The privacy effects of randomization reduce rapidly with increasing dimensionality. With increasing dimensionality, no privacy is practically possible. (2) The properties of the underlying data set can affect the anonymity level of the randomization method. For example, natural properties of real data sets such as clustering improve the effectiveness of randomization. On the other hand, variations in data density of non-empty data localities and outliers create privacy preservation challenges for the randomization method. (3) The presence of public information makes the choice of perturbing distribution more critical than previously thought. In particular, Gaussian perturbations are significantly more effective than uniformly distributed perturbations for the high dimensional case. These insights are very useful for future research and design of the randomization method.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.98"))) ("PrePrint: CDAMA: Concealed Data Aggregation Scheme for Multiple Applications in Wireless Sensor Networks" "For wireless sensor networks, data aggregation schemes that reduce a large amount of transmission is the most practical technique. In previous studies, homomorphic encryptions have been applied to conceal communication during aggregation such that enciphered data can be aggregated algebraically without decryption. Since aggregators collect data without decryption, adversaries are not able to forge aggregated results by compromising them. However, these schemes are not satisfy multi-application environments. Second, these schemes become insecure in case some sensor nodes are compromised. Third, these schemes do not provide secure counting; thus, they may suffer unauthorized aggregation attacks. Therefore, we propose a new concealed data aggregation scheme extended from Boneh et al.'s homomorphic public encryption system. The proposed scheme has three contributions. First, it is designed for a multi-application environment. The base station extracts application-specific data from aggregated ciphertexts. Next, it mitigates the impact of compromising attacks in single application environments. Finally, it degrades the damage from unauthorized aggregations. To prove the proposed scheme's robustness and efficiency, we also conducted the comprehensive analyses and comparisons in the end." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.94" (20681 64082 756672) new 26 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: CDAMA: Concealed Data Aggregation Scheme for Multiple Applications in Wireless Sensor Networks") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.94") (description nil "For wireless sensor networks, data aggregation schemes that reduce a large amount of transmission is the most practical technique. In previous studies, homomorphic encryptions have been applied to conceal communication during aggregation such that enciphered data can be aggregated algebraically without decryption. Since aggregators collect data without decryption, adversaries are not able to forge aggregated results by compromising them. However, these schemes are not satisfy multi-application environments. Second, these schemes become insecure in case some sensor nodes are compromised. Third, these schemes do not provide secure counting; thus, they may suffer unauthorized aggregation attacks. Therefore, we propose a new concealed data aggregation scheme extended from Boneh et al.'s homomorphic public encryption system. The proposed scheme has three contributions. First, it is designed for a multi-application environment. The base station extracts application-specific data from aggregated ciphertexts. Next, it mitigates the impact of compromising attacks in single application environments. Finally, it degrades the damage from unauthorized aggregations. To prove the proposed scheme's robustness and efficiency, we also conducted the comprehensive analyses and comparisons in the end.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.94"))) ("PrePrint: Achieving Data Privacy through Secrecy Views and Null-Based Virtual Updates" "We may want to keep sensitive information in a relational database hidden from a user or group thereof. We characterize sensitive data as the extensions of secrecy views. The database, before returning the answers to a query posed by a restricted user, is updated to make the secrecy views empty or a single tuple with null values. Then, a query about any of those views returns no meaningful information. Since the database is not supposed to be physically changed for this purpose, the updates are only virtual, and also minimal. Minimality makes sure that query answers, while being privacy preserving, are also maximally informative. The virtual updates are based on null values as used in the SQL standard. We provide the semantics of secrecy views, virtual updates, and secret answers to queries. The different instances resulting from the virtually updates are specified as the models of a logic program with stable model semantics, which becomes the basis for computation of the secret answers." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.86" (20681 64082 756672) new 27 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Achieving Data Privacy through Secrecy Views and Null-Based Virtual Updates") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.86") (description nil "We may want to keep sensitive information in a relational database hidden from a user or group thereof. We characterize sensitive data as the extensions of secrecy views. The database, before returning the answers to a query posed by a restricted user, is updated to make the secrecy views empty or a single tuple with null values. Then, a query about any of those views returns no meaningful information. Since the database is not supposed to be physically changed for this purpose, the updates are only virtual, and also minimal. Minimality makes sure that query answers, while being privacy preserving, are also maximally informative. The virtual updates are based on null values as used in the SQL standard. We provide the semantics of secrecy views, virtual updates, and secret answers to queries. The different instances resulting from the virtually updates are specified as the models of a logic program with stable model semantics, which becomes the basis for computation of the secret answers.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.86"))) ("PrePrint: Distributed Strategies for Mining Outliers in Large Data Sets" "In this work we introduce a distributed method for detecting distance-based outliers in very large data sets. Our approach is based on the concept of outlier detection solving set [2], which is a small subset of the data set that can be also employed for predicting novel outliers. The method exploits parallel computation in order to obtain vast time savings. Indeed, beyond preserving the correctness of the result, the proposed schema exhibits excellent performances. From the theoretical point of view, for common settings, the temporal cost of our algorithm is expected to be at least three order of magnitude faster than the classical nested-loop like approach to detect outliers. Experimental results show that the algorithm is efficient and that its running time scales quite well for increasing number of nodes. We discuss also a variant of the basic strategy which reduces the amount of data to be transferred in order to improve both the communication cost and the overall run time. Importantly, the solving set computed by our approach in distributed environment has the same quality as that produced by the corresponding centralized method." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.71" (20681 64082 756672) new 28 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Distributed Strategies for Mining Outliers in Large Data Sets") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.71") (description nil "In this work we introduce a distributed method for detecting distance-based outliers in very large data sets. Our approach is based on the concept of outlier detection solving set [2], which is a small subset of the data set that can be also employed for predicting novel outliers. The method exploits parallel computation in order to obtain vast time savings. Indeed, beyond preserving the correctness of the result, the proposed schema exhibits excellent performances. From the theoretical point of view, for common settings, the temporal cost of our algorithm is expected to be at least three order of magnitude faster than the classical nested-loop like approach to detect outliers. Experimental results show that the algorithm is efficient and that its running time scales quite well for increasing number of nodes. We discuss also a variant of the basic strategy which reduces the amount of data to be transferred in order to improve both the communication cost and the overall run time. Importantly, the solving set computed by our approach in distributed environment has the same quality as that produced by the corresponding centralized method.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.71"))) ("PrePrint: Crowdsourced Trace Similarity with Smartphones" "Smartphones are nowadays equipped with a number of sensors, such as WiFi, GPS, accelerometers, etc. This capability allows smartphone users to easily engage in crowdsourced computing services, which contribute to the solution of complex problems in a distributed manner. In this work, we leverage such a computing paradigm to solve efficiently the following problem: comparing a query trace Q against a crowd of traces generated and stored on distributed smartphones. Our proposed framework, coined SmartTrace+, provides an effective solution without disclosing any part of the crowd traces to the query processor. SmartTrace+, relies on an in-situ data storage model and intelligent top-K query processing algorithms that exploit distributed trajectory similarity measures, resilient to spatial and temporal noise, in order to derive the most relevant answers to Q. We evaluate our algorithms on both synthetic and real workloads. We describe our prototype system developed on the Android OS. The solution is deployed over our own SmartLab testbed of 25 smartphones. Our study reveals that computations over SmartTrace+ result in substantial energy conservation; in addition, results can be computed faster than competitive approaches." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.55" (20681 64082 756672) new 29 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Crowdsourced Trace Similarity with Smartphones") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.55") (description nil "Smartphones are nowadays equipped with a number of sensors, such as WiFi, GPS, accelerometers, etc. This capability allows smartphone users to easily engage in crowdsourced computing services, which contribute to the solution of complex problems in a distributed manner. In this work, we leverage such a computing paradigm to solve efficiently the following problem: comparing a query trace Q against a crowd of traces generated and stored on distributed smartphones. Our proposed framework, coined SmartTrace+, provides an effective solution without disclosing any part of the crowd traces to the query processor. SmartTrace+, relies on an in-situ data storage model and intelligent top-K query processing algorithms that exploit distributed trajectory similarity measures, resilient to spatial and temporal noise, in order to derive the most relevant answers to Q. We evaluate our algorithms on both synthetic and real workloads. We describe our prototype system developed on the Android OS. The solution is deployed over our own SmartLab testbed of 25 smartphones. Our study reveals that computations over SmartTrace+ result in substantial energy conservation; in addition, results can be computed faster than competitive approaches.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.55"))) ("PrePrint: Determining k-Most Demanding Products with Maximum Expected Number of Total Customers" "In this paper, a problem of production plans, named k-Most Demanding Products discovering, is formulated. Given a set of customers demanding a certain type of products with multiple attributes, a set of existing products of the type, a set of candidate products which can be offered by a company, and a positive integer k, we want to help the company to select k products from the candidate products such that the expected number of the total customers for the k products is maximized. We show the problem is NP-hard when the number of attributes for a product is 3 or more. One greedy algorithm is proposed to find approximate solution for the problem. We also attempt to find the optimal solution of the problem by estimating the upper bound of the expected number of the total customers for a set of k candidate products for reducing the search space of the optimal solution. An exact algorithm is then provided to find the optimal solution of the problem by using this pruning strategy. The experiment results demonstrate that both the efficiency and memory requirement of the exact algorithm are comparable to those for the greedy algorithm, and the greedy algorithm is well scalable with respect to k." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.53" (20681 64082 756672) new 30 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Determining k-Most Demanding Products with Maximum Expected Number of Total Customers") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.53") (description nil "In this paper, a problem of production plans, named k-Most Demanding Products discovering, is formulated. Given a set of customers demanding a certain type of products with multiple attributes, a set of existing products of the type, a set of candidate products which can be offered by a company, and a positive integer k, we want to help the company to select k products from the candidate products such that the expected number of the total customers for the k products is maximized. We show the problem is NP-hard when the number of attributes for a product is 3 or more. One greedy algorithm is proposed to find approximate solution for the problem. We also attempt to find the optimal solution of the problem by estimating the upper bound of the expected number of the total customers for a set of k candidate products for reducing the search space of the optimal solution. An exact algorithm is then provided to find the optimal solution of the problem by using this pruning strategy. The experiment results demonstrate that both the efficiency and memory requirement of the exact algorithm are comparable to those for the greedy algorithm, and the greedy algorithm is well scalable with respect to k.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.53"))) ("PrePrint: Co-Occurrence Based Diffusion for Expert Search On the Web" "Expert search has been studied in different contexts, e.g. enterprises, academic communities. We examine a general expert search problem: searching experts on the Web, where millions of Web pages and thousands of names are considered. It has mainly two challenging issues: (1) Web pages could be of varying quality and full of noises; (2) The expertise evidences scattered in Web pages are usually vague and ambiguous. We propose to leverage the large amount of co-occurrence information to assess relevance and reputation of a person name for a query topic. The co-occurrence structure is modeled using a hypergraph, on which a heat diffusion based ranking algorithm is proposed. Query keywords are regarded as heat sources, and a person name which has strong connection with the query (i.e. frequently co-occur with query keywords and co-occur with other names related to query keywords) will receive most of the heat, thus being ranked high. Experiments on the ClueWeb09 Web collection show that our algorithm is effective for retrieving experts and outperforms baseline algorithms significantly. This work would be regarded as one step towards addressing the more general entity search problem without sophisticated NLP techniques." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.49" (20681 64082 756672) new 31 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Co-Occurrence Based Diffusion for Expert Search On the Web") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.49") (description nil "Expert search has been studied in different contexts, e.g. enterprises, academic communities. We examine a general expert search problem: searching experts on the Web, where millions of Web pages and thousands of names are considered. It has mainly two challenging issues: (1) Web pages could be of varying quality and full of noises; (2) The expertise evidences scattered in Web pages are usually vague and ambiguous. We propose to leverage the large amount of co-occurrence information to assess relevance and reputation of a person name for a query topic. The co-occurrence structure is modeled using a hypergraph, on which a heat diffusion based ranking algorithm is proposed. Query keywords are regarded as heat sources, and a person name which has strong connection with the query (i.e. frequently co-occur with query keywords and co-occur with other names related to query keywords) will receive most of the heat, thus being ranked high. Experiments on the ClueWeb09 Web collection show that our algorithm is effective for retrieving experts and outperforms baseline algorithms significantly. This work would be regarded as one step towards addressing the more general entity search problem without sophisticated NLP techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.49"))) ("PrePrint: Update Summarization via Graph-Based Sentence Ranking" "Due to the fast evolution of the information on the Internet, update summarization has received much attention in recent years. It is to summarize an evolutionary document collection at current time supposing the users have read some related previous documents. In this article, we propose a graph-ranking based method. It performs constrained reinforcements on a sentence graph, which unifies previous and current documents, to determine the salience of the sentences. The constraints ensure that the most salient sentences in current documents are updates to previous documents. Since this method is NP-hard, we then propose its approximate method, which is polynomial time solvable. Experiments on the TAC 2008 and 2009 benchmark data sets show the effectiveness and efficiency of our method." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.42" (20681 64082 756672) new 32 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Update Summarization via Graph-Based Sentence Ranking") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.42") (description nil "Due to the fast evolution of the information on the Internet, update summarization has received much attention in recent years. It is to summarize an evolutionary document collection at current time supposing the users have read some related previous documents. In this article, we propose a graph-ranking based method. It performs constrained reinforcements on a sentence graph, which unifies previous and current documents, to determine the salience of the sentences. The constraints ensure that the most salient sentences in current documents are updates to previous documents. Since this method is NP-hard, we then propose its approximate method, which is polynomial time solvable. Experiments on the TAC 2008 and 2009 benchmark data sets show the effectiveness and efficiency of our method.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.42"))) ("PrePrint: Optimal Route Queries with Arbitrary Order Constraints" "Given a set of spatial points DS, each of which is associated with categorical information, e.g., restaurant, pub, etc., the optimal route query finds the shortest path that starts from the query point (e.g., a home or hotel), and covers a user-specified set of categories. The user may also specify partial order constraints between different categories. Previous work has focused on a special case where the query contains the total order of all categories to be visited. For the general scenario without such a total order, the only known solution reduces the problem to multiple, total-order optimal route queries. As we show in this paper, this naive approach incurs a significant amount of repeated computations, and, thus, is not scalable to large datasets. Motivated by this, we propose novel solutions to the general optimal route query, based on two different methodologies, namely backward search and forward search. In addition, we discuss how the proposed methods can be adapted to answer a variant of the optimal route queries, in which the route only needs to cover a subset of the given categories. Extensive experiments, using both real and synthetic datasets, confirm that the proposed solutions are efficient and practical, and outperform existing methods by large margins." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.36" (20681 64082 756672) new 33 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Optimal Route Queries with Arbitrary Order Constraints") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.36") (description nil "Given a set of spatial points DS, each of which is associated with categorical information, e.g., restaurant, pub, etc., the optimal route query finds the shortest path that starts from the query point (e.g., a home or hotel), and covers a user-specified set of categories. The user may also specify partial order constraints between different categories. Previous work has focused on a special case where the query contains the total order of all categories to be visited. For the general scenario without such a total order, the only known solution reduces the problem to multiple, total-order optimal route queries. As we show in this paper, this naive approach incurs a significant amount of repeated computations, and, thus, is not scalable to large datasets. Motivated by this, we propose novel solutions to the general optimal route query, based on two different methodologies, namely backward search and forward search. In addition, we discuss how the proposed methods can be adapted to answer a variant of the optimal route queries, in which the route only needs to cover a subset of the given categories. Extensive experiments, using both real and synthetic datasets, confirm that the proposed solutions are efficient and practical, and outperform existing methods by large margins.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.36"))) ("PrePrint: Improving Word Similarity by Augmenting PMI with Estimates of Word Polysemy" "Pointwise mutual information (PMI) is a widely used word similarity measure, but it lacks a clear explanation of how it works. We explore how PMI differs from distributional similarity, and we introduce a novel metric, PMI_max, that augments PMI with information about a word's number of senses. The coefficients of PMI_max are determined empirically by maximizing a utility function based on the performance of automatic thesaurus generation. We show that it outperforms traditional PMI in the application of automatic thesaurus generation and in two word similarity benchmark tasks: human similarity ratings and TOEFL synonym questions. PMI_max achieves a correlation coefficient comparable to the best knowledge-based approaches on the Miller-Charles similarity rating dataset." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.30" (20681 64082 756672) new 34 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Improving Word Similarity by Augmenting PMI with Estimates of Word Polysemy") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.30") (description nil "Pointwise mutual information (PMI) is a widely used word similarity measure, but it lacks a clear explanation of how it works. We explore how PMI differs from distributional similarity, and we introduce a novel metric, PMI_max, that augments PMI with information about a word's number of senses. The coefficients of PMI_max are determined empirically by maximizing a utility function based on the performance of automatic thesaurus generation. We show that it outperforms traditional PMI in the application of automatic thesaurus generation and in two word similarity benchmark tasks: human similarity ratings and TOEFL synonym questions. PMI_max achieves a correlation coefficient comparable to the best knowledge-based approaches on the Miller-Charles similarity rating dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.30"))) ("PrePrint: A Survival Modeling Approach to Biomedical Search Result Diversification Using Wikipedia" "In this paper, we propose a survival modeling approach to promoting ranking diversity for biomedical information retrieval. The proposed approach concerns with finding relevant documents that can deliver more different aspects of a query. First, two probabilistic models derived from the survival analysis theory are proposed for measuring aspect novelty. Second, a new method using Wikipedia to detect aspects covered by retrieved documents is presented. Third, an aspect filter based on a two-stage model is introduced. It ranks the detected aspects in decreasing order of the probability that an aspect is generated by the query. Finally, the relevance and the novelty of retrieved documents are combined at the aspect level for re-ranking. Experiments conducted on the TREC 2006 and 2007 Genomics collections demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach in promoting ranking diversity for biomedical information retrieval. Moreover, we further evaluate our approach in the Web retrieval environment. The evaluation results on the ClueWeb09-T09B collection show that our approach can achieve promising performance improvements." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.24" (20681 64082 756672) new 35 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Survival Modeling Approach to Biomedical Search Result Diversification Using Wikipedia") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.24") (description nil "In this paper, we propose a survival modeling approach to promoting ranking diversity for biomedical information retrieval. The proposed approach concerns with finding relevant documents that can deliver more different aspects of a query. First, two probabilistic models derived from the survival analysis theory are proposed for measuring aspect novelty. Second, a new method using Wikipedia to detect aspects covered by retrieved documents is presented. Third, an aspect filter based on a two-stage model is introduced. It ranks the detected aspects in decreasing order of the probability that an aspect is generated by the query. Finally, the relevance and the novelty of retrieved documents are combined at the aspect level for re-ranking. Experiments conducted on the TREC 2006 and 2007 Genomics collections demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach in promoting ranking diversity for biomedical information retrieval. Moreover, we further evaluate our approach in the Web retrieval environment. The evaluation results on the ClueWeb09-T09B collection show that our approach can achieve promising performance improvements.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.24"))) ("PrePrint: Information-Theoretic Outlier Detection for Large-Scale Categorical Data" "Outlier detection can usually be considered as a pre-processing step for locating, in a dataset, those objects that do not conform to well-defined notions of expected behavior. It is very important in data mining for discovering novel or rare events, anomalies, vicious actions, exceptional phenomena, etc. We are investigating outlier detection for categorical datasets. This problem is especially challenging because of the difficulty of defining a meaningful similarity measure for categorical data. In this paper, we propose a formal definition of outliers and an optimization model of outlier detection, via a new concept of holo-entropy that takes both entropy and total correlation into consideration. Based on this model, we define a function for the outlier factor of an object which is solely determined by the object itself and can be updated efficiently. We propose two practical 1-parameter outlier detection methods, named ITB-SS and ITB-SP, which require no user-defined parameters for deciding whether an object is an outlier. Users need only provide the number of outliers they want to detect. Experimental results show that ITB-SS and ITB-SP are more effective and efficient than mainstream methods and can be used to deal with both large and high-dimensional datasets where existing algorithms fail." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.261" (20681 64082 756672) new 36 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Information-Theoretic Outlier Detection for Large-Scale Categorical Data") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.261") (description nil "Outlier detection can usually be considered as a pre-processing step for locating, in a dataset, those objects that do not conform to well-defined notions of expected behavior. It is very important in data mining for discovering novel or rare events, anomalies, vicious actions, exceptional phenomena, etc. We are investigating outlier detection for categorical datasets. This problem is especially challenging because of the difficulty of defining a meaningful similarity measure for categorical data. In this paper, we propose a formal definition of outliers and an optimization model of outlier detection, via a new concept of holo-entropy that takes both entropy and total correlation into consideration. Based on this model, we define a function for the outlier factor of an object which is solely determined by the object itself and can be updated efficiently. We propose two practical 1-parameter outlier detection methods, named ITB-SS and ITB-SP, which require no user-defined parameters for deciding whether an object is an outlier. Users need only provide the number of outliers they want to detect. Experimental results show that ITB-SS and ITB-SP are more effective and efficient than mainstream methods and can be used to deal with both large and high-dimensional datasets where existing algorithms fail.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.261"))) ("PrePrint: Protecting Sensitive Labels in Social Network Data Anonymization" "Privacy is one of the major concerns when publishing or sharing social network data for social science research and business analysis. Recently, researchers have developed privacy models similar to $k$-anonymity to prevent node re-identification through structure information. However, even when these privacy models are enforced, an attacker may still be able to infer one's private information if a group of nodes largely share the same sensitive labels (i.e., attributes). In other words, the label-node relationship is not well protected by pure structure anonymization methods. Furthermore, existing approaches, which rely on edge editing or node clustering and merging, may significantly alter key graph properties. In this paper, we define a $k$-degree-$l$-diversity anonymity model that considers the protection of structural information as well as sensitive labels of individuals. We further propose a novel anonymization methodology based on adding noise nodes. We develop several algorithms to add noise nodes into the original graph with the consideration of introducing the least distortion to graph properties. Most importantly, we provide a rigorous analysis of the theoretical upper bound on the number of noise nodes added and their impacts on important graph properties. We conduct extensive experiments to evaluate the effectiveness of the proposed technique." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.259" (20681 64082 756672) new 37 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Protecting Sensitive Labels in Social Network Data Anonymization") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.259") (description nil "Privacy is one of the major concerns when publishing or sharing social network data for social science research and business analysis. Recently, researchers have developed privacy models similar to $k$-anonymity to prevent node re-identification through structure information. However, even when these privacy models are enforced, an attacker may still be able to infer one's private information if a group of nodes largely share the same sensitive labels (i.e., attributes). In other words, the label-node relationship is not well protected by pure structure anonymization methods. Furthermore, existing approaches, which rely on edge editing or node clustering and merging, may significantly alter key graph properties. In this paper, we define a $k$-degree-$l$-diversity anonymity model that considers the protection of structural information as well as sensitive labels of individuals. We further propose a novel anonymization methodology based on adding noise nodes. We develop several algorithms to add noise nodes into the original graph with the consideration of introducing the least distortion to graph properties. Most importantly, we provide a rigorous analysis of the theoretical upper bound on the number of noise nodes added and their impacts on important graph properties. We conduct extensive experiments to evaluate the effectiveness of the proposed technique.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.259"))) ("PrePrint: Transfer Across Completely Different Feature Spaces via Spectral Embedding" "In many applications, it is difficult to obtain a lot of labeled examples. One practically important problem is: can the labeled data from other related sources help predict the target task, even if they have (a) different feature spaces (e.g., image vs. text data), (b) different data distributions, and (c) different output spaces? This paper proposes a solution and discusses the conditions where this is highly likely to produce better results. It first unifies the feature spaces of the target and source data sets by spectral embedding, even when they are with completely different feature spaces. The principle is to devise an optimization objective that preserves the original structure of the data, while at the same time, maximizes the similarity between the two. A linear projection model, as well as a non-linear approach are derived on the basis of this principle with closed forms. Second, a judicious sample selection strategy is applied to select only those related source examples. At last, a Bayesian-based approach is applied to model the relationship between different output spaces. The three steps can bridge related heterogeneous sources in order to learn the target task. Among the 20 experiment data sets, the proposed models can reduce the error rate by as much as 50%." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.252" (20681 64082 756672) new 38 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Transfer Across Completely Different Feature Spaces via Spectral Embedding") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.252") (description nil "In many applications, it is difficult to obtain a lot of labeled examples. One practically important problem is: can the labeled data from other related sources help predict the target task, even if they have (a) different feature spaces (e.g., image vs. text data), (b) different data distributions, and (c) different output spaces? This paper proposes a solution and discusses the conditions where this is highly likely to produce better results. It first unifies the feature spaces of the target and source data sets by spectral embedding, even when they are with completely different feature spaces. The principle is to devise an optimization objective that preserves the original structure of the data, while at the same time, maximizes the similarity between the two. A linear projection model, as well as a non-linear approach are derived on the basis of this principle with closed forms. Second, a judicious sample selection strategy is applied to select only those related source examples. At last, a Bayesian-based approach is applied to model the relationship between different output spaces. The three steps can bridge related heterogeneous sources in order to learn the target task. Among the 20 experiment data sets, the proposed models can reduce the error rate by as much as 50%.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.252"))) ("PrePrint: A New Algorithm for Inferring User Search Goals with Feedback Sessions" "For a broad-topic and ambiguous query, different users may have different search goals when they submit it to a search engine. The inference and analysis of user search goals can be very useful in improving search engine relevance and user experience. In this paper, we propose a novel approach to infer user search goals by analyzing search engine query logs. Firstly, we propose a framework to discover different user search goals for a query by clustering the proposed feedback sessions. Feedback sessions are constructed from user click-through logs and can efficiently reflect the information needs of users. Secondly, we propose a novel approach to generate pseudo-documents to better represent the feedback sessions for clustering. Finally, we propose a new criterion 'Classified Average Precision (CAP)' to evaluate the performance of inferring user search goals. Experimental results are presented using user click-through logs from a commercial search engine to validate the effectiveness of our proposed methods." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.248" (20681 64082 756672) new 39 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A New Algorithm for Inferring User Search Goals with Feedback Sessions") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.248") (description nil "For a broad-topic and ambiguous query, different users may have different search goals when they submit it to a search engine. The inference and analysis of user search goals can be very useful in improving search engine relevance and user experience. In this paper, we propose a novel approach to infer user search goals by analyzing search engine query logs. Firstly, we propose a framework to discover different user search goals for a query by clustering the proposed feedback sessions. Feedback sessions are constructed from user click-through logs and can efficiently reflect the information needs of users. Secondly, we propose a novel approach to generate pseudo-documents to better represent the feedback sessions for clustering. Finally, we propose a new criterion 'Classified Average Precision (CAP)' to evaluate the performance of inferring user search goals. Experimental results are presented using user click-through logs from a commercial search engine to validate the effectiveness of our proposed methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.248"))) ("PrePrint: Fuzzy Web Data Tables Integration Guided by an Ontological and Terminological Resource" "In this paper, we present the design of the ONDINE system which allows the loading and the querying of a data warehouse opened on the Web, guided by a domain Termino-Ontological Resource (TOR). The data warehouse, composed of data tables extracted from Web documents, has been built to supplement existing local data sources. First we present the main steps of our semi-automatic method to annotate Web data tables driven by a domain TOR. The output of this method is an XML/RDF data warehouse composed of XML documents representing Web data tables with their fuzzy RDF annotations. We then present our flexible querying system which allows the local data sources and the XML/RDF data warehouse to be simultaneously and uniformly queried, using the domain TOR. This system relies on SPARQL and permits to retrieve approximate answers extracted from Web data tables by comparing preferences, expressed in selection criteria using fuzzy sets, with fuzzy RDF annotations." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.245" (20681 64082 756672) new 40 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Fuzzy Web Data Tables Integration Guided by an Ontological and Terminological Resource") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.245") (description nil "In this paper, we present the design of the ONDINE system which allows the loading and the querying of a data warehouse opened on the Web, guided by a domain Termino-Ontological Resource (TOR). The data warehouse, composed of data tables extracted from Web documents, has been built to supplement existing local data sources. First we present the main steps of our semi-automatic method to annotate Web data tables driven by a domain TOR. The output of this method is an XML/RDF data warehouse composed of XML documents representing Web data tables with their fuzzy RDF annotations. We then present our flexible querying system which allows the local data sources and the XML/RDF data warehouse to be simultaneously and uniformly queried, using the domain TOR. This system relies on SPARQL and permits to retrieve approximate answers extracted from Web data tables by comparing preferences, expressed in selection criteria using fuzzy sets, with fuzzy RDF annotations.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.245"))) ("PrePrint: Radio Database Compression for Accurate Energy-Efficient Localization in Fingerprinting Systems" "Location fingerprinting is a positioning method that exploits the already existing infrastructures such as cellular networks or WLANs. Regarding the recent demand for energy efficient networks and the emergence of issues like green networking, we propose a clustering technique to compress the radio database in the context of cellular fingerprinting systems. The aim of the proposed technique is to reduce the computation cost and transmission load in the mobile-based implementations. The presented method may be called Block-based Weighted Clustering (BWC) technique, which is applied in a concatenated location-radio signal space, and attributes different weight factors to the location and radio components. Computer simulations and real experiments have been conducted to evaluate the performance of our proposed technique in the context of a GSM network. The obtained results confirm the efficiency of the BWC technique, and show that it improves the performance of standard k-means and hierarchical clustering methods." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.241" (20681 64082 756672) new 41 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Radio Database Compression for Accurate Energy-Efficient Localization in Fingerprinting Systems") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.241") (description nil "Location fingerprinting is a positioning method that exploits the already existing infrastructures such as cellular networks or WLANs. Regarding the recent demand for energy efficient networks and the emergence of issues like green networking, we propose a clustering technique to compress the radio database in the context of cellular fingerprinting systems. The aim of the proposed technique is to reduce the computation cost and transmission load in the mobile-based implementations. The presented method may be called Block-based Weighted Clustering (BWC) technique, which is applied in a concatenated location-radio signal space, and attributes different weight factors to the location and radio components. Computer simulations and real experiments have been conducted to evaluate the performance of our proposed technique in the context of a GSM network. The obtained results confirm the efficiency of the BWC technique, and show that it improves the performance of standard k-means and hierarchical clustering methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.241"))) ("PrePrint: Facilitating Effective User Navigation through Web Site Structure Improvement" "Designing well-structured Web sites to facilitate effective user navigation has long been a challenge. A primary reason is that the Web developers' understanding of how a Web site should be structured can be considerably different from that of the users. While various methods have been proposed to re-link Web pages to improve navigability using user navigation data, the completely reorganized new structure can be highly unpredictable, and the cost of disorienting users after the changes remains unanalyzed. This paper addresses how to improve a Web site without introducing substantial changes. Specifically, we propose a mathematical programming model to improve the user navigation on a Web site while minimizing alterations to its current structure. Results from extensive tests conducted on a publicly available real data set indicate that our model not only significantly improves the user navigation with very few changes, but also can be effectively solved. We have also tested the model on large synthetic data sets to demonstrate that it scales up very well. In addition, we define two evaluation metrics and use them to assess the performance of the improved Web site using the real data set. Evaluation results confirm that the user navigation on the improved structure is indeed greatly enhanced." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.238" (20681 64082 756672) new 42 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Facilitating Effective User Navigation through Web Site Structure Improvement") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.238") (description nil "Designing well-structured Web sites to facilitate effective user navigation has long been a challenge. A primary reason is that the Web developers' understanding of how a Web site should be structured can be considerably different from that of the users. While various methods have been proposed to re-link Web pages to improve navigability using user navigation data, the completely reorganized new structure can be highly unpredictable, and the cost of disorienting users after the changes remains unanalyzed. This paper addresses how to improve a Web site without introducing substantial changes. Specifically, we propose a mathematical programming model to improve the user navigation on a Web site while minimizing alterations to its current structure. Results from extensive tests conducted on a publicly available real data set indicate that our model not only significantly improves the user navigation with very few changes, but also can be effectively solved. We have also tested the model on large synthetic data sets to demonstrate that it scales up very well. In addition, we define two evaluation metrics and use them to assess the performance of the improved Web site using the real data set. Evaluation results confirm that the user navigation on the improved structure is indeed greatly enhanced.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.238"))) ("PrePrint: Range-Based Skyline Queries in Mobile Environments" "Skyline query processing in location-based services, which considers both spatial and non-spatial attributes of the objects being queried, has recently received increasing attention. Existing solutions focus on solving point- or line-based skyline queries, in which the query location is an exact location point or a line segment. However, due to privacy consideration and limited precision of localization devices, the input of a user location is often a two-dimensional range. This paper studies a new problem on how to process such range-based skyline queries. Two novel algorithms are proposed: one is index-based (I-SKY) and the other is not based on any index (N-SKY). To handle frequent movements of the objects being queried, we also propose incremental versions of I-SKY and N-SKY, which avoid recomputing the query index and results from scratch. Additionally, we develop efficient solutions for probabilistic and continuous range-based skyline queries. Experimental results show that our proposed algorithms well outperform the baseline algorithm that simply adopts the existing line-based skyline solution. Moreover, the incremental versions of I-SKY and N-SKY save substantial computation costs, especially when the objects move frequently." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.229" (20681 64082 756672) new 43 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Range-Based Skyline Queries in Mobile Environments") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.229") (description nil "Skyline query processing in location-based services, which considers both spatial and non-spatial attributes of the objects being queried, has recently received increasing attention. Existing solutions focus on solving point- or line-based skyline queries, in which the query location is an exact location point or a line segment. However, due to privacy consideration and limited precision of localization devices, the input of a user location is often a two-dimensional range. This paper studies a new problem on how to process such range-based skyline queries. Two novel algorithms are proposed: one is index-based (I-SKY) and the other is not based on any index (N-SKY). To handle frequent movements of the objects being queried, we also propose incremental versions of I-SKY and N-SKY, which avoid recomputing the query index and results from scratch. Additionally, we develop efficient solutions for probabilistic and continuous range-based skyline queries. Experimental results show that our proposed algorithms well outperform the baseline algorithm that simply adopts the existing line-based skyline solution. Moreover, the incremental versions of I-SKY and N-SKY save substantial computation costs, especially when the objects move frequently.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.229"))) ("PrePrint: Building a Scalable Database-Driven Reverse Dictionary" "In this paper, we describe the design and implementation of a reverse dictionary. Unlike a traditional forward dictionary, which maps from words to their definitions, a reverse dictionary takes a user input phrase describing the desired concept, and returns a set of candidate words that satisfy the input phrase. This work has significant application not only for the general public, particularly those who work closely with words, but also in the general field of conceptual search. We present a set of algorithms and the results of a set of experiments showing the retrieval accuracy of our methods and the runtime response time performance of our implementation. Our experimental results show that our approach can provide significant improvements in performance scale without sacrificing the quality of the result. Our experiments comparing the quality of our approach to that of currently available reverse dictionaries show that of our approach can provide significantly higher quality over either of the other currently-available implementations." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.225" (20681 64082 756672) new 44 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Building a Scalable Database-Driven Reverse Dictionary") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.225") (description nil "In this paper, we describe the design and implementation of a reverse dictionary. Unlike a traditional forward dictionary, which maps from words to their definitions, a reverse dictionary takes a user input phrase describing the desired concept, and returns a set of candidate words that satisfy the input phrase. This work has significant application not only for the general public, particularly those who work closely with words, but also in the general field of conceptual search. We present a set of algorithms and the results of a set of experiments showing the retrieval accuracy of our methods and the runtime response time performance of our implementation. Our experimental results show that our approach can provide significant improvements in performance scale without sacrificing the quality of the result. Our experiments comparing the quality of our approach to that of currently available reverse dictionaries show that of our approach can provide significantly higher quality over either of the other currently-available implementations.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.225"))) ("PrePrint: Mining User Queries with Markov Chains: Application to Online Image Retrieval." "We propose a novel method for automatic annotation, indexing and annotation-based retrieval of images. The new method, that we call Markovian Semantic Indexing (MSI), is presented in the context of an online image retrieval system. Assuming such a system, the users' queries are used to construct an \\textit{Aggregate Markov Chain} ($AMC$) through which the relevance between the keywords seen by the system is defined. The users' queries are also used to automatically annotate the images. A stochastic distance between images, based on their annotation and the keyword relevance captured in the $AMC$, is then introduced. Geometric interpretations of the proposed distance are provided and its relation to a clustering in the keyword space is investigated. By means of a new measure of Markovian state similarity, the \\textit{mean first cross passage time} ($CPT$), optimality properties of the proposed distance are proved. Images are modeled as points in a vector space and their similarity is measured with MSI. The new method is shown to possess certain theoretical advantages and also to achieve better Precision vs Recall results when compared to Latent Semantic Indexing (LSI) and probabilistic Latent Semantic Indexing (pLSI) methods in Annotation Based Image Retrieval (ABIR) tasks." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.219" (20681 64082 756672) new 45 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Mining User Queries with Markov Chains: Application to Online Image Retrieval.") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.219") (description nil "We propose a novel method for automatic annotation, indexing and annotation-based retrieval of images. The new method, that we call Markovian Semantic Indexing (MSI), is presented in the context of an online image retrieval system. Assuming such a system, the users' queries are used to construct an \\textit{Aggregate Markov Chain} ($AMC$) through which the relevance between the keywords seen by the system is defined. The users' queries are also used to automatically annotate the images. A stochastic distance between images, based on their annotation and the keyword relevance captured in the $AMC$, is then introduced. Geometric interpretations of the proposed distance are provided and its relation to a clustering in the keyword space is investigated. By means of a new measure of Markovian state similarity, the \\textit{mean first cross passage time} ($CPT$), optimality properties of the proposed distance are proved. Images are modeled as points in a vector space and their similarity is measured with MSI. The new method is shown to possess certain theoretical advantages and also to achieve better Precision vs Recall results when compared to Latent Semantic Indexing (LSI) and probabilistic Latent Semantic Indexing (pLSI) methods in Annotation Based Image Retrieval (ABIR) tasks.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2011.219"))) ("PrePrint: Rough Hypercuboid Approach for Feature Selection in Approximation Spaces" "The selection of relevant and significant features is an important problem particularly for data sets with large number of features. In this regard, a new feature selection algorithm is presented based on rough hypercuboid approach. It selects a set of features from a data set by maximizing the relevance, dependency, and significance of the selected features. By introducing the concept of hypercuboid equivalence partition matrix, a novel representation of degree of dependency of sample categories on features is proposed to measure the relevance, dependency, and significance of features in approximation spaces. The equivalence partition matrix also offers an efficient way to calculate many more quantitative measures to describe the inexactness of approximate classification. Several quantitative indices are introduced based on rough hypercuboid approach for evaluating the performance of proposed method. The superiority of the proposed method over other feature selection methods, in terms of computational complexity and classification accuracy, is established extensively on various real life data sets of different sizes and dimensions." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.242" (20681 64082 756672) new 46 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Rough Hypercuboid Approach for Feature Selection in Approximation Spaces") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.242") (description nil "The selection of relevant and significant features is an important problem particularly for data sets with large number of features. In this regard, a new feature selection algorithm is presented based on rough hypercuboid approach. It selects a set of features from a data set by maximizing the relevance, dependency, and significance of the selected features. By introducing the concept of hypercuboid equivalence partition matrix, a novel representation of degree of dependency of sample categories on features is proposed to measure the relevance, dependency, and significance of features in approximation spaces. The equivalence partition matrix also offers an efficient way to calculate many more quantitative measures to describe the inexactness of approximate classification. Several quantitative indices are introduced based on rough hypercuboid approach for evaluating the performance of proposed method. The superiority of the proposed method over other feature selection methods, in terms of computational complexity and classification accuracy, is established extensively on various real life data sets of different sizes and dimensions.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.242"))) ("PrePrint: Signature-Based Detection of Notable Transitions in Numeric Data Streams" "A major challenge in large-scale process monitoring is to recognise significant transitions in the process conditions and to distinguish them from random fluctuations that do not produce a notable change in the process dynamics. Such transitions should be recognised at the early stages of their development using a minimal \"snapshot\" of the observable process log. We consider a novel approach to detecting notable transitions based on analysis of coherent behavior of frequency components in the process log (coherency portraits). We have found that notable transitions in the process dynamics are characterised by unique coherency portraits, which are also invariant with respect to the random process fluctuations. Our experimental study demonstrates the significant efficiency of our approach as compared to traditional change detection techniques." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.241" (20681 64082 756672) new 47 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Signature-Based Detection of Notable Transitions in Numeric Data Streams") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.241") (description nil "A major challenge in large-scale process monitoring is to recognise significant transitions in the process conditions and to distinguish them from random fluctuations that do not produce a notable change in the process dynamics. Such transitions should be recognised at the early stages of their development using a minimal \"snapshot\" of the observable process log. We consider a novel approach to detecting notable transitions based on analysis of coherent behavior of frequency components in the process log (coherency portraits). We have found that notable transitions in the process dynamics are characterised by unique coherency portraits, which are also invariant with respect to the random process fluctuations. Our experimental study demonstrates the significant efficiency of our approach as compared to traditional change detection techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.241"))) ("PrePrint: Mining Weakly-Labeled Web Facial Images for Search-Based Face Annotation" "This paper investigates a framework of Search-Based Face Annotation (SBFA) by mining weakly-labeled facial images that are freely available on the World Wide Web (WWW). One challenging problem for search-based face annotation scheme is how to effectively perform annotation by exploiting the list of most similar facial images and their weak labels that are often noisy and incomplete. To tackle this problem, we propose an effective Unsupervised Label Refinement (ULR) approach for refining the labels of web facial images using machine learning techniques. We formulate the learning problem as a convex optimization and develop effective optimization algorithms to solve the large-scale learning task efficiently. To further speed up the proposed scheme, we also propose a clustering-based approximation algorithm which can improve the scalability considerably. We have conducted an extensive set of empirical studies on a large-scale web facial image testbed, in which encouraging results showed that the proposed ULR algorithms can significantly boost the performance of the promising SBFA scheme." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.240" (20681 64082 756672) new 48 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Mining Weakly-Labeled Web Facial Images for Search-Based Face Annotation") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.240") (description nil "This paper investigates a framework of Search-Based Face Annotation (SBFA) by mining weakly-labeled facial images that are freely available on the World Wide Web (WWW). One challenging problem for search-based face annotation scheme is how to effectively perform annotation by exploiting the list of most similar facial images and their weak labels that are often noisy and incomplete. To tackle this problem, we propose an effective Unsupervised Label Refinement (ULR) approach for refining the labels of web facial images using machine learning techniques. We formulate the learning problem as a convex optimization and develop effective optimization algorithms to solve the large-scale learning task efficiently. To further speed up the proposed scheme, we also propose a clustering-based approximation algorithm which can improve the scalability considerably. We have conducted an extensive set of empirical studies on a large-scale web facial image testbed, in which encouraging results showed that the proposed ULR algorithms can significantly boost the performance of the promising SBFA scheme.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.240"))) ("PrePrint: Discovering Emerging Topics in Social Streams via Link Anomaly Detection" "Detection of emerging topics is now receiving renewed interest motivated by the rapid growth of social networks. Conventional term-frequency-based approaches may not be appropriate in this context, because the information exchanged in social-network posts include not only text but also images, URLs, and videos. We focus on emergence of topics signaled by social aspects of theses networks. Specifically, we focus on mentions of users -- links between users that are generated dynamically (intentionally or unintentionally) through replies, mentions, and retweets. We propose a probability model of the mentioning behaviour of a social network user, and propose to detect the emergence of a new topic from the anomalies measured through the model. Aggregating anomaly scores from hundreds of users, we show that we can detect emerging topics only based on the reply/mention relationships in social network posts. We demonstrate our technique in several real data sets we gathered from Twitter. The experiments show that the proposed mention-anomaly-based approaches can detect new topics at least as early as text-anomaly-based approaches, and in some cases much earlier when the topic is poorly identified by the textual contents in posts." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.239" (20681 64082 756672) new 49 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Discovering Emerging Topics in Social Streams via Link Anomaly Detection") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.239") (description nil "Detection of emerging topics is now receiving renewed interest motivated by the rapid growth of social networks. Conventional term-frequency-based approaches may not be appropriate in this context, because the information exchanged in social-network posts include not only text but also images, URLs, and videos. We focus on emergence of topics signaled by social aspects of theses networks. Specifically, we focus on mentions of users -- links between users that are generated dynamically (intentionally or unintentionally) through replies, mentions, and retweets. We propose a probability model of the mentioning behaviour of a social network user, and propose to detect the emergence of a new topic from the anomalies measured through the model. Aggregating anomaly scores from hundreds of users, we show that we can detect emerging topics only based on the reply/mention relationships in social network posts. We demonstrate our technique in several real data sets we gathered from Twitter. The experiments show that the proposed mention-anomaly-based approaches can detect new topics at least as early as text-anomaly-based approaches, and in some cases much earlier when the topic is poorly identified by the textual contents in posts.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TKDE.2012.239"))) ("IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering - Jan. 2013 (Vol. 25, No. 1)" "IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering" "http://www.computer.org/portal/site/tkde/" (20681 64082 756672) new 50 nil nil ((title nil "IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering - Jan. 2013 (Vol. 25, No. 1)") (link nil "http://www.computer.org/portal/site/tkde/") (description nil "IEEE Transactions on Knowledge and Data Engineering") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://www.computer.org/portal/site/tkde/"))))